_	The seller could get a very good price if it agrees to bear the risk that the project's baseline and monitoring methodology is rejected; that the host country rejects the project; that the CDM Executive Board rejects the project; that the project for some reason produces fewer credits than planned; or that the buyer doesn't get CERs at the agreed time if the international transaction log (the technical infrastructure ensuring international transfer of carbon credits) is not in place by then.
_	Secretary of State James Madison supported the embargo with equal vigor to Jefferson, while Treasury Secretary Gallatin opposed it, due to its indefinite time frame and the risk that it posed to the policy of American neutrality.
_	The clashes have widely been seen as symptomatic for the high tensions among the forces that fight against the Islamic State of Iraq and the Levant (ISIL) around Sinjar, and the risk that these tensions could escalate into turf wars, which would degrade any attempts to drive the extremist group from the region for good.
_	Rahal's team had to keep pulling his backup car out of line, and moving to the rear, increasing the risk that he would not be able to re-qualify if he got bumped.
_	To mitigate the risk that a recipient might sue the sender of an infected email, a disclaimer might warn of the possibility of infection and advise the recipient to conduct their own scan.
_	Frequently demonstrating live code may help reduce the risk that the requirements are incorrect.
_	This may be done unconsciously by the therapist – for example, they may encourage a female to be a nurse, when they would have encouraged a male client of the same abilities to be a doctor, but there is the risk that the goals and outcomes of therapy will be evaluated differently in accordance with the therapist's beliefs and values.
_	Treatment for idiopathic scoliosis also depends upon the severity of the curvature, the spine’s potential for further growth, and the risk that the curvature will progress.
_	Spiders in the U.S., due to the risk that heat from the engine could cause the soft top hydraulic hoses to fracture and leak flammable fluid onto the V8 engine, resulting in a fire.
_	This also avoids the risk that an unshielded jumper will accidentally short out something critical (particularly if it is dropped on a live circuit).
_	People are confused about what is allowed and what is not, with the risk that the law falls into disrepute."
_	This carries the risk that unconsciousness may result before the need to breathe becomes overwhelming, which is why hyperventilation is particularly dangerous before free diving.
_	This raised the risk that the historical contents of the castle might be sold off at open auction; and some of Wellington's former belongings were therefore removed by his family for safekeeping.
_	Additionally, there is the risk that contaminated air would flow into the laboratory if the exhaust system for a Type B1 or B2 cabinet were to fail.
_	Writing for the Court, Justice Powell found that "if preindictment proceedings were made public, many prospective witnesses would be hesitant to come forward voluntarily"; "witnesses who appeared before the grand jury would be less likely to testify fully and frankly"; and "there also would be the risk that those about to be indicted would flee, or would try to influence individual grand jurors".
_	So the attack on Harpers Ferry that had been planned for September 11 was delayed, increasing the risk that McClellan might engage and destroy a portion of Lee's army while it was divided.
_	Acknowledging the risk that is involved when a patient is moved, they deemed that Liu was fit to travel abroad in order to receive the care which they were willing to provide him.
_	Later in the afternoon, the risk that day was upgraded to a high risk over parts of East Texas.
_	Aware of the risk that federal criminal liability could metastasize, we held in "Lemire" that "not every breach of a fiduciary duty works a criminal fraud."
_	In addition, several “special” vaccines (that is, licensed but not routine for otherwise healthy children and young adults) should be given to decrease the risk that an A-T patient will develop lung infections.
_	There may be an additional reason — perhaps the annulment of vows was moved to, or repeated at, the commencement of the Day of Atonement in order to minimize the risk that new vows would be made in the ten-day interval between the repudiation of vows on Rosh Hashana and the Day of Atonement, and, more than the rather dry legalistic Rosh Hashana declaration, Kol Nidre includes an emotional expression of penitence that sets the theme for the Day of Atonement.
_	However, there is also the risk that these advances can make it easier for terrorists to produce biological weapons.
_	The rite was considered necessary for salvation, and so midwives often baptized children to avoid the risk that the child would die unbaptized.
_	This is important because, as the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission explains, "By investing in more than one asset category, you'll reduce the risk that you'll lose money and your portfolio's overall investment returns will have a smoother ride."
_	Under rules-based regulation, there is the risk that financial firms set up complex harmful structures that comply with the letter of the rules.
_	When such a loan is created, the creditor bears the risk that the property will decline sharply in value (in which case the creditor is repaid with property worth less than the amount borrowed), and the debtor does not bear the risk of decrease in property value (because the debtor is guaranteed the right to use the property, regardless of value, to satisfy the debt.)
_	She rejects Hawkins' business offer - partly because he also proposed for marriage - and decides to go into business yet again with Madison, despite the risk that they will lose everything if they do not finish the telephone lines.
_	The sponsor’s guarantee typically covers the conduit’s roll-over risk, which is the risk that a conduit cannot refinance maturing commercial paper, possibly because of a deterioration of conduit asset values.
_	There is also the risk that in a bigger group there will more false alarm signals.
_	However, when one attempted to buy (and therefore possess) too many personalities, there was the risk that one of the personas would wrest control of the body from the possessor.
_	This makes the script more portable, but also increases the risk that the wrong interpreter is selected because it searches for a match in every directory on the executable search path.
_	There was something about it that appealed to me, I think it was the risk of putting something up that will be judged by so many, the risk that someone will hate it and paint over it, or it will be praised by someone you’ll never meet."
_	Slade could not take the risk that Stottlemeyer or Braddock would piece together what Peschel was telling them.
_	Although Hagrid is obviously very experienced and knowledgeable, he doesn't "have a normal person's view of what's dangerous", an example being that the Care of Magical Creatures students were required to get a literally ferocious textbook called the "Monster Book of Monsters", and so consistently misjudges the risk that the animals he uses in his lessons pose to his students, which sometimes results in chaos.
_	Concerns include the cost of MRV and enforcement, and the risk that facilities may lie about actual emissions.
_	In this frame, the risk that any near-Earth object poses is typically seen through a lens that is a function of both the culture and the technology of human society.
_	A general problem is that long term predictions about submarine or underground storage security are very difficult and uncertain, and there is still the risk that might leak into the atmosphere.
_	Toyota also states that "their systems are designed to reduce the risk that tin whiskers will form in the first place."
_	For birds that transport food to their mates and/or their young over long distances — especially seabirds — it is impractical to carry food in their bills because of the risk that it would be stolen by other birds, such as frigatebirds, skuas and gulls.
_	This is very much like bet-hedging the risk that a future environment will be similar or different.
_	This approach is not subject to the risk that other files being written to the filesystem will disrupt a deleted file very quickly; permanent deletion will happen on a predictable schedule or with manual intervention only.
_	Năstase commented that "They resigned to eliminate suspicions and the risk that the government will be forced to explain minor issues instead of taking care of important matters," referring to Romania's bid to join the EU.
_	Lack of victim identification increased the risk that victims were punished for immigration violations or other unlawful acts as a direct result of being trafficked.
_	When hunting, mature females of "P. fimbriata", "P. africana", "P. fimbriata", "P. labiata", and "P. schultzi" emit olfactory signals that reduce the risk that any other females, males or juveniles of the same species may contend for the same prey.
_	Pension funds are also subject to reinvestment risk especially with the short-term nature of cash investments there is always the risk that future proceeds will have to be reinvested at a lower interest rate.
_	Replacing instructions runs the risk that the code may fail to find the expected content if it reads itself; one cannot protect code against reading while allowing normal execution, and replacing in place becomes complicated.
_	Attacking Arctic convoys meant the risk that the ships of the fleet might be sunk or damaged in the ensuring engagements, while the role of a fleet in being required the continual existence of these ships.
_	By taking samples from cows and people she could evaluate the risk that Nigerians made when they drank unpasteurized milk.
_	"Functional safety" is a general term referring to the design of a system that reduces the risk that a hazardous event harmful to humans can occur with a system.
_	However, the longer Pattern 1853 was more suitable for infantry units which fought in line formation of several ranks deep, in order to minimize the risk that the men in the rear ranks would accidentally shoot the men in the front ranks in the back of the head, or scorch their faces and burst their eardrums with the muzzle blast.
_	However, by doing this, there is the risk that the detached signature will become separated from its associated data.
_	US intelligence officials justified the order in reference to the risk that the Al-Qaeda in the Arabian Peninsula was developing explosives that would bypass scanners and metal detectors.
_	As the gene is passed from the carrier to their offspring, the risk that Rebecca or her children could suffer is high.
_	In February 2012, workers at the airport staged a sit-in in protest at the risk that their redundancy payments might not materialise after the airport's bankers had seized its working capital.
_	This reduces the risk that production staff will forget to replace it with the final image.
_	This method leaves the risk that many cups are missed by the random sampling—and seriously contaminated copra might be missed.
_	Ferry routes, which require Locomotive cards to be played when claiming them, and Tunnel routes, which adds the risk that additional train cards may be necessary to complete the route.
_	A dispersal technique of spreading the launch complexes were apart was also employed to reduce the risk that one powerful nuclear warhead could destroy multiple launch sites.
_	And the description is formulated by reference to the nature of the risk that ought to have been foreseen."
_	Vote trading occasionally occurs between United States citizens domiciled in different states (and therefore citizens of those respective states) to demonstrate support for third-party candidates while minimizing the risk that their more favored (or less disfavored) major-party candidate will lose electoral votes in the nationwide election ("i.e.", the "spoiler effect").
_	In 2003, the deportation of Krekar from Norway to Iraq was ordered, but the order was suspended due to concerns about the human rights situation in Iraq, particularly the risk that Krekar would be tortured or executed.
_	In the early 2000s the FDA's resources to screen DTC ads were not keeping pace with the number of ads being produced, raising the risk that the inappropriate ads were not removed.
_	But in "R v Baker and Ward" (1999) 2 Cr. App. R. 335 this was slightly modified at p344: "What a defendant has to be aware of is the risk that the group might try to coerce him into committing criminal offences of the type for which he is being tried by the use of violence or threats of violence."
_	Although widely acknowledged as one of the most innovative and effective developments in global environmental governance in recent years, the partnerships have faced criticism due to fears of a lack of accountability, and the risk that they may exacerbate inequalities of power between Northern and Southern states.
_	This form of vote pairing encourages third-party support while minimizing the risk that the more favored major-party candidate will lose electoral votes in the nationwide election (i.e., the "spoiler effect").
_	Cardiovascular risk is indicated by biological markers and screening can measure the risk that a child will be born with a genetic disease such as Cystic fibrosis.
_	While the phenomenological experience of insight can help to differentiate insight-solving from non-insight solving (by asking the respondent to describe how they solved the problem, for example), the risk that non-insight solving has been mistaken for insight solving still exists.
_	He co-sponsored "Innocence Protection Act of 2001" (H.R. 912, S.486) to "reduce the risk that innocent persons may be executed [by examining DNA evidence more thoroughly]" and the "National Death Penalty Moratorium Act of 2001" (H.R.1038, S.233) to limit capital punishment until the National Commission on the Death Penalty reviewed the "fairness of the imposition of the death penalty".
_	Mushroom expert Monica Svensson criticized him for including it, because of the mushroom's carcinogenic substances and the risk that inexperienced people might misinterpret the recipe and omit the steps that reduce the toxicity level.
_	The treatment of latent tuberculosis infection (LTBI) is essential to controlling and eliminating TB by reducing the risk that TB infection will progress to disease.
_	Eden reportedly objected, citing the risk that Hitler may take up similar offers for the Jews of Germany and Poland, and said "... and there simply are not enough ships and means of transportation to handle them."
_	It should not be given to children due to the risk that they will stop breathing and should not be used in people with "Clostridium difficile" infection.
_	Breaking contracts would potentially lead to higher interest rates, as investors demand higher compensation for taking the risk that their contracts may be subject to homeowner bailouts or relief mandated by the government.
_	I, the economic and political situation in Veneto was critical, so that a former Prime Minister and native of Venice, Luigi Luzzatti, wrote to Prime Minister Vittorio Emanuele Orlando and told him there could be a "Venetian Ireland", in parallel to the simultaneous Irish War of Independence, while the prefect of Treviso signalled the risk that a separatist movement aimed at separating Veneto from Italy might flourish in the province of Treviso.
_	On his fear upon facing six bulls and the risk that it entails, Miguel had said: "Of course there are some nerves.
_	While those that buy into the early access do get an incomplete game to play, test out, and provide input to the developers, these people also run the risk that the game will never be completed or may be a sub-par product.
_	In addition, like in the late 1970s, the financial industry had powerful political leverage on its side: the risk that revoking the cramdown restriction would result in higher interest rates on home loans.
_	There remains the risk that the dynamic response of atolls and reef islands does not result in stable islands as tropical cyclones can strip the low-lying islands of their vegetation and soil.
_	And there is the risk that we come to see others as objects to be accessed--and only for the parts we find useful, comforting, or amusing".
_	Depending on the device and its design, failure to completely clean a single-use device could lead to cross patient infection or there is the risk that the chemicals used to clean the device will themselves pose a risk to patients by being absorbed, for example, by the plastic from which the device is made and then subsequently leaching out into a patient's body.
_	He warned of the risk that agreement would unravel because there was insufficient time to consider technical issues.
_	It has been suggested that the risk that such judges may not act independently is mitigated by public scrutiny of judicial decisions and the fact that it is to the judge's advantage, for future appointment, if he or she were to act independently in accordance with the law.
_	Allocation to efficient New Zealand firms reduces the risk that emissions will 'leak' offshore.
_	Dow ruled against five states (Michigan, Pennsylvania, Ohio, Minnesota, and Wisconsin), stating that five Chicago-area shipping locks will stay open despite the risk that Lake Michigan Asian carp pose to the multi-billion dollar fishing industry, saying not enough evidence was presented that indicated the danger was truly imminent.
_	While the second shooter might miss deliberately, there would then be the risk that the third one would shoot him.
_	After several years of training under Splinter, the Turtles set out to find whoever is responsible for their transformation, and upon learning that Shredder was behind it, they vow to put an end to his ongoing criminal career and restore Splinter back to his human form, despite the risk that they themselves could be de-mutated and changed back into ordinary turtles, thus losing all of their humanoid abilities.
_	Following the Fukushima disaster, the NRC prepared a report in 2011 to examine the risk that dam failures posed on the nation's fleet of nuclear reactors.
_	Of significant concern to Mexican authorities is the risk that the prison could be attacked from the outside as part of an organized prison break.
_	Since a mortgage lender is not willing to take the risk that a homeowner will not pay property tax, escrow is usually required under the mortgage terms.
_	With no land in sight and no life-boats, the crew had no immediate choice but to stay with the floating hulk of the Lyman D. Foster, despite the risk that swelling of the wet timber cargo would damage the hull.
_	Iran's offer to open its uranium enrichment program to foreign private and public participation mirrors suggestions of an IAEA expert committee which was formed to investigate the methods to reduce the risk that sensitive fuel cycle activities could contribute to national nuclear weapons capabilities.
_	Low (as opposed to zero or negative) inflation reduces the severity of economic recessions by enabling the labor market to adjust more quickly in a downturn, and reduces the risk that a liquidity trap prevents monetary policy from stabilizing the economy.
_	Audit risk (also referred to as residual risk) refers to the risk that an auditor may issue an unqualified report due to the auditor's failure to detect material misstatement either due to error or fraud.
_	When hunting, "P. schultzi" mature females emit olfactory signals that reduce the risk that any other females, males, or juveniles of the same species may contend for the same prey.
_	Find out in the beginning and keep this important information safe and secure (at the risk that they'll change the method but at least you'll have a starting point).
_	There is also the risk that an improperly secured load may be shed in transit, often leading to accidents or road blockages.
_	They do, however, also warn of the risk that, since "political enfranchisement remains as was – one person, one vote, at some point it is likely that labor will fight back against the rising profit share of the rich and there will be a political backlash against the rising wealth of the rich."
_	The merchant's acquiring bank accepts the risk that the merchant will remain solvent over time as during chargeback it has to return total sum to customer and that sum has to be received back from merchant, and thus has an incentive to take a keen interest in the merchant's products and business practices.
_	However, this advantage had the risk that an improperly executed or aborted BIOS update could render the computer or device unusable.
_	In response to the risk that certain foods pose to those with food allergies, some countries have responded by instituting labeling laws that require food products to clearly inform consumers if their products contain major allergens or byproducts of major allergens among the ingredients intentionally added to foods.
_	The therapy was carefully targeted around that key area to avoid (in part) the risk that 'the focal therapy would have degenerated into long-term psychotherapy or psychoanalysis'.
_	Refinancing risk exists at this point, since it is possible that at the time of payment, the borrower will not be able to refinance the loan; the borrower faces the risk of having insufficient liquid funds, and the lender faces the risk that the payment may be delayed.
_	Sometimes the risk that the good is kept is reduced by it being a special model or having signs on it that cannot easily be removed, making it obvious that it is owned by the rental company; this is especially effective for goods used in public places, but even when used at home it may help due to social control.
_	AFRICA for the AUC, other potential applicants faced the risk that at any time ICANN would announce that it was giving the strings to the AUC.
_	However, hands-on authentication requires that the holder of the PUF relinquishes control of it, which may not be acceptable, especially if there is the risk that the verifier is an impostor.
_	Promoting these "fancy" characters, Georges Peignot played with the classic structure of the letter (unchanged since the fifteenth century), and took easily the risk that its customers would sacrifice readability to the beauty of characters, very "Art Nouveau".
_	However, as a result of the Soviet troop withdrawal from Afghanistan in February 1989, President George H. W. Bush was advised a few months later to no longer certify that Pakistan was not involved in the development of nuclear weapons in accordance with the Pressler Amendment, which banned most economic and military assistance to Pakistan unless the President certified on an annual basis that "Pakistan does not possess a nuclear explosive device and that the proposed United States assistance program will reduce significantly the risk that Pakistan will possess a nuclear explosive device."
_	Journals may still want to perform an independent peer review, without the potential conflict of interest that financial reimbursement may cause, or the risk that an author has contracted multiple peer review services but only presents the most favorable one.
_	These observations lead to speculation that "M. mexicanus" individuals reject foreigners based on the risk that they may usurp their nest.
_	Its task "is to undertake an assessment of the risk that long-term sentenced offenders might pose to the safety of the community if they were to be released before the end of their sentence".
_	This arrangement acts as a simple steam separator and minimises the risk that water will be carried over to the cylinders where it might cause a hydraulic lock, also known as priming.
_	At one time, antibiotics were routinely added to certain compound foodstuffs to promote growth, but this practice is now frowned on in many countries because of the risk that it may lead to antibiotic resistance.
_	Settlement risk is the risk that a counterparty (or intermediary agent) fails to deliver a security or its value in cash as per agreement when the security was traded after the other counterparty or counterparties have already delivered security or cash value as per the trade agreement.
_	There is also the risk that traffic congestion might increase, rather than decrease.
_	Advocates of climate restoration accept that climate change has already had major negative impacts and these will get progressively worse with the risk that they will be beyond adaptation and abrupt climate change will be upon us.
_	Aware of the risk that the treaty might be rejected, Bayard and Chamberlain agreed on a two-year working agreement, allowing Americans to continue their fishing in Canadian waters by paying a fee.
_	Systemic risk is the risk that an amplification or leverage or positive feedback process presents to a system.
_	To avoid the risk that B-29s might be wasted by theater commanders on the battlefields when they would be much more useful against the Japanese home islands, the Joint Chiefs agreed in April 1944 to establish the Twentieth Air Force as a non-theater command controlled directly by the JCS, and approved Operation Matterhorn, a plan for bombing Japanese strategic targets with B–29s based in China.
_	In response to the risk that certain foods pose to those with food allergies, some countries have responded by instituting labeling laws that require food products to clearly inform consumers if their products contain major allergens or byproducts of major allergens among the ingredients intentionally added to foods.
_	The results are rising insurance premiums, and the risk that in some areas flood insurance will become unaffordable for those in the lower income brackets.
_	Counterparty risk is the risk that a counterparty in a derivatives transaction will default prior to expiration of the trade and will not make the current and future payments required by the contract.
_	The length of a musket also allowed them to be fired by ranks, minimizing the risk that the men in the rear ranks would accidentally shoot the men in the front ranks in the back of the head, or, more likely, scorch their faces and burst their eardrums with the muzzle blast.
_	In colder climates, in harsh weather and where winter food supplies may be scarce, they may roost in farm buildings and in barns between hay bales, but they then run the risk that their selected nesting hole may be taken over by some other, earlier-nesting species.
_	Belly landings carry the risk that the aircraft may flip over, disintegrate, or catch fire if it lands too fast or too hard.
_	In contrast, if they only had , then they would be forced to play the the first time spades were led, with the risk that another player will respond with .
_	Given the risk that the country was facing from boundary disputes with Chile, the new minister formed a special committee to acquire modern weapons in Europe.
_	Moreover, he already emphasized in the 1990s the risk that excessive budget deficits in the Eurozone may pressure the European Central Bank to violate its fiscal restrictions and bail out excessively indebted governments ex post (by monetizing the government's debt) or ex ante (by keeping interest rates very low), thus in turn priming the Eurozone for high inglation (with Barry Eichengreen).
_	This risk needs to weighed against the risk that the treatment will cause significant bleeding, as the reported risk of major bleeding is over 3% per year, and 11% of those with major bleeding may die as a result.
_	Rawls argues that each of us would reject the utilitarian theory of justice that we should maximize welfare (see below) because of the risk that we might turn out to be someone whose own good is sacrificed for greater benefits for others.
_	Among them is Hotep who he forced into perpetual slumber so as to nullify the risk that her lust for revenge posed.
_	Thanks to the infrastructure that had already been built in the area, the risk that the oil would reach the Gulf of Eilat significantly dropped.
_	Currency risk is the risk that the value of the currency a bond pays out will decline compared to the holder's reference currency.
_	When we portray our sacred in film and fiction, others will believe that our sacred is, in fact, sacred, although, admittedly, at the risk that others will ridicule."
_	Treatment for idiopathic scoliosis also depends upon the severity of the curvature, the spine’s potential for further growth, and the risk that the curvature will progress.
_	A rule concerning the radiuses of projections and edges tries to address the risk that the stick might unintentionally become more of a weapon than a playing tool.
_	Resolving the second challenge requires assembling a collaborative team that has to fit well with the particular challenges of the project and has to function almost immediately to reduce the risk that performance might be adversely affected.
_	The demonstrator was initially powered by General Electric F404-GE-400 afterburning turbofans from the F/A-18 Hornet, instead of the Snecma M88, to reduce the risk that often comes with a first flight, and since the M88 was not considered sufficiently mature for the initial trials programme.
_	Unconfirmed acceptance credit means that the seller takes the risk that payment will not be made, due to any number of contingencies such as shipment non-delivery, confiscation by customs authorities, or any other problems.
_	In both military and foreign policy assassinations, there is the risk that the target could be replaced by an even more competent leader, or that such a killing (or a failed attempt) will "martyr" a leader and lead to greater support of his or her cause (by showing the moral ruthlessness of the assassins).
_	The Met declined repeated requests by the IPCC to disclose hundreds of pages of internal papers that gave the Met's private assessment of the operation, including discussions about how much compensation the Met thought it should pay to the Menezes family; the risk that individual officers might face murder or manslaughter charges; the vulnerability of Blair and the Met to an action for civil damages; and whether Special Branch officers altered surveillance logs.
_	The news of the death of Hitler reduced the risk that the Germans would fight to the last bullet.
_	But that carried the risk that when the war ended, so would the justification for freeing the slaves.
_	If a horse loses the use of one leg temporarily, there is the risk that other legs will break down during the recovery period because they are carrying an abnormal weight load.
_	In addition to the ethical problems of promising benefits that can not reasonably be expected to occur, quackery also includes the risk that patients may choose to forego treatments that are more likely to help them, in favor of ineffective treatments given by the "quack".
_	In February 2003 the Norwegian government ordered Krekar to be deported to Iraq, but as of July 2009 the order had not been implemented because of the security environment in Iraq, and the risk that Krekar could face the death penalty there, as Norway will not deport people in these circumstances.
_	Until the construction of the bridge, the inhabitants of Murcia complained repeatedly about the risk that those black powder transports meant for the city.
_	Women who are pregnant or couples planning a pregnancy can have themselves tested for the "CFTR" gene mutations to determine the risk that their child will be born with CF.
_	At one time, antibiotics were routinely added to certain compound foodstuffs to promote growth, but this practice is now frowned on in many countries because of the risk that it may lead to antibiotic resistance.
_	In response to the risk that certain foods pose to those with food allergies, some countries have responded by instituting labeling laws that require food products to clearly inform consumers if their products contain major allergens or byproducts of major allergens among the ingredients intentionally added to foods.
_	This carries the risk that changing environmental conditions threaten the success of the innovation in development.
_	The term describes the risk that a particular investment might be canceled or stopped somehow, that one may have to find a new place to invest that money with the risk being that there might not be a similarly attractive investment available.
_	The background for this policy is the risk that transactions fail and are reversed because contractual terms were misunderstood or ambiguous.
_	- choosing a holiday from a virtual travel agents - but with the risk that climate change may have led to unexpected changes at the destination.
_	By lending that money on to Mr Haddon they were necessarily taking the risk that he might not be able to repay them, "in which event they themselves would have to repay it without recourse to him."
_	This creates the risk that one or both partners will try to use the alliance to create an advantage over the other.
_	Needless to say, it would have been to run the risk that our country would have been destroyed by the United States.
_	The effects produced by sampling risk generally can increase audit risk, the risk that an entity's financial statements will contain a material misstatement, though given an unqualified ('clean') audit report.
_	Some designs immerse the entire reactor and heat exchangers into a pool of coolant, virtually eliminating the risk that inner-loop cooling will be lost.
_	The greater the potential return one might seek, the greater the risk that one generally assumes.
_	To ensure that in the smoke and confusion of a night battle his ships would not accidentally open fire on one another, Nelson ordered that each ship prepare four horizontal lights at the head of their mizzen mast and hoist an illuminated White Ensign, which was different enough from the French tricolour that it would not be mistaken in poor visibility, reducing the risk that British ships might fire on one another in the darkness.
_	It is common for engineers and purchasers to avoid components that are only available from a single source, to avoid the risk that a problem with the supplier would prevent a popular and profitable product from being manufactured.
_	The high scorers showed a correlation between the amount of distress they reported having over their HIV status, and their acceptance of risk during sexual behavior – the greater the distress, the greater the risk that these people would take.
_	Roger Boisjoly, the Thiokol engineer most vocal about the danger of launching at extreme low temperatures because of the risk that the O-ring seals in the shuttle's rocket boosters would fail at those temperatures.
_	This order also reduces the risk that a diver will become separated from the team if the line-layer has to stop for any reason.
_	But that carried the risk that when the war ended, so would the justification for freeing the slaves.
_	Meanwhile, Mossad agents Gad Shahar and Pinhas Katsir moved from house to house in Casablanca and persuaded the children's parents to allow their children to go to Israel without them with the risk that the Moroccan authorities might find out.
_	All along, the British accept the risk that the IRA may discover that Marty works for them.
_	No cars followed the race up the Zoncolan due to the risk that they would stall on the mountain and obstruct the riders.
_	Ahead of the election, the financial markets started to price in the risk that the election could result in a new government led by parties seeking to reverse the austerity measures.
_	This increases the trading volume cleared by the market maker and increases their profit, but increases the risk that the trader will receive a margin call.
_	Another would be not flying in order not to take the risk that the airplane were to be hijacked.
_	A tension results from the risk that the necessity of transcendence, if taken too literally, would compromise AA's efforts to maintain a broad appeal.
_	Along with other U.S. universities in Doha, WCM-Q runs the risk that their reputation could be weakened by having a campus in Education City.
_	One example is the use of risk assessments in criminal sentencing in the United States and parole hearings, judges were presented with an algorithmically generated score intended to reflect the risk that a prisoner will repeat a crime.
_	B can be also spread through sharing equipment, which carries the risk that the disease might be transmitted to the non-drug using population.
_	Note that by continuing to play instead of exposing your ordinary win, you run the risk that another player may complete a winning hand and expose it before you can achieve your double win, in which case you gain nothing for your concealed winning hand.
_	Kiribati remains exposed to the risk that cyclones can strip the low-lying islands of their vegetation and soil.
_	These changes also reduced the risks of the Colt Dragoon Revolver from exploding when fired, unlike the risk that had been demonstrated with the Walker revolvers.
_	Decisions about treatment type and timing may, therefore, be informed by an estimation of the risk that the tumor will ultimately recur after treatment and/or progress to metastases and mortality.
_	A particular concern is the risk that the organization's focus will shift away from the social mission.
_	According to her, this mindset may lead to hypocrisy by adults who assume that all their actions intended to protect children and creates the risk that adults may wield power "for the children's own good".
_	On February 15, 2010, the Amtsgericht Tiergarten confiscated all European PC versions for violation of (representation of violence), meaning they may not be sold; however, it is still legal to import (with the risk that the game is confiscated by customs) and own the game.
_	This meant that the cylinders had to be manhandled through communication trenches, often clogged and sodden, and stored at the front where there was always the risk that cylinders would be prematurely breached during a bombardment.
_	Other factors that are taken into account when assessing the value of a pipeline include the size of the target market of each drug, the market share that the drug is expected to capture and the risk that it will not be approved.
_	If the employer blames gross misconduct for summary dismissal, the tribunal may be wary of the risk that misconduct was trumped up to gross misconduct to avoid paying for the notice period.
_	Accordingly, the Marshall Plan authorized the U.S. government to insure private U.S. investors against the risk that earnings generated overseas in foreign currencies might not be convertible into U.S. dollars.
_	While corporate governance primarily concerns the general relative rights and duties of shareholders, employees and directors in terms of administration and accountability, corporate finance concerns how the monetary or capital stake of shareholders and creditors are mediated, given the risk that the business may fail and become insolvent.
_	Furthermore, dry sex increases the risk that a condom will break because of the increased friction.
_	This step increases the risk that the use of will be prohibited or restricted in the near- to mid-term.
_	Other problems include longer compile times and the risk that programmers may accidentally link working code into the defunct code, inadvertently resurrecting it.
_	The weight of the plaster created the risk that the roof would collapse, and between 1924 and 1927 Sir John Simpson dismantled the entire hall, straightening warped timbers, removing the plaster, replacing any unserviceable sections and then putting the entire hall back together.
_	In the extreme, there is the risk that governments could gather too much private information, now that the governments are giving themselves more powers to access citizens' information.
_	Detection Risk (DR) is the risk that the auditor will not detect a misstatement that exists in an assertion that could be material (significant), either individually or when aggregated with other misstatements.
_	This was because the team wanted to create a connection between players and Adam despite the risk that it might break immersion.
_	The voter of an independent direct candidate had in comparison with the two-vote system of today not the possibility to vote a party, with the risk that his vote in a case of unsuccessfulness of the candidate was lost.
_	The logic behind these laws was generally that a lender should be permitted to call a loan due when the property securing the loan is sold only if the lender could demonstrate that the sale and transfer of the property reduced the lender's security or increased the risk that the loan would go into default.
_	There is also the risk that a developer could profit from the ideas or work done by users, like this example:
_	Devlin because he considered that, by that stage of the trial, an acquittal seemed straightforward and knowing it would create the risk that the jury would take silence as an indication of guilt.
_	In the case of those nationals, such as Jamaicans, who also require visas in order to travel to the UK to pursue cases before the JCPC, there is the risk that the denial of the visa could negatively impact on the ability for their cases to be heard, thus further reducing potential accessibility (especially if the work load is not sufficient to justify the JCPC travelling to their jurisdiction instead).
_	For example, tobacco smoking and mutations in the gene expressing glutathione S-transferase Mu 1 both put men at risk for infertility; these factors may also exacerbate the risk that varicocele will affect fertility.
_	There is also subjective recklessness, such as in the case of "R v Cunningham" (1957), where the defendant is not required to intend the consequence to come from his actions, but the defendant realised the risk that this consequence would occur and took the risk anyway.
_	Execution risks include the risk that a plaintiff could not execute a judgment against the defendant.
_	While the British could muster troops to the south of the lake, and the Belgians had troops to the north, neither could push into German East Africa because of the risk that the Germans would use their boats to transport troops across the lake, and use them to cut their supply and communications lines.
_	However, the British did not agree with this choice, in view of Akhundzada's alleged policy of encouraging Taliban attacks, and the risk that his return could spark new fighting between rival drug gangs.
_	Questions were raised in Parliament about the safety of tunnelling so close to the vaults of many City banks and the risk that subsidence might cause vault doors to jam shut.
_	Also because the trials are based on witnesses' testimonies, the length of time between the crime and trial heightens the risk that the witnesses' memories will be unreliable.
_	International organizations voiced concerns over the proliferation of weapons in the region, and the risk that they might fall into the hands of militant Islamists.
_	John Flamanck's report of a secret conversation between several officials in Calais in 1504, on the likely sequel if the King should die, referred to the risk that she would seize Calais and hold it in Suffolk's name.
_	In the late 1980s, however, he would develop suspicions regarding what he saw as the PT's increasing radicalism, which, associated to his usual misanthropy ("by my aristocratic calling I mean setting strict bounds to sympathies for my neighbors"), led him eventually to express a fear that the emergence of a grassroots, mass, trade-union-based and anti-intellectual Left, such as that which the Workers' Party represented, meant the risk that Brazil and the Brazilians could distance themselves from "our cultural heritage [sic] which is the Illuminist West, the USA, our North American peers in size, which since Franklin Roosevelt want us to be their South American partners".
_	The statistical approach allows the auditor to measure the risk that is being sampled to help in reducing it to an acceptable level.
_	MammaPrint is a prognostic and predictive diagnostic test for early stage breast cancer patients that assess the risk that a tumor will metastasize to other parts of the body.
_	Fearing the risk that Nariakira might misunderstand the connection between his family and Tadayuki's family, Tadatake, however, could not view the marriage proposal in a positive light.
_	Liquidity risk generally refers to the risk that a company may not have sufficient funding to satisfy its short-term needs, either through its cash flows, maturing assets, or assets salable at prices equivalent to book value, or through its ability to access funding markets.
_	These germination requirements reduce the risk that it will become an invasive species.
_	When hunting, mature females of "P. labiata", "P. africana", "P. fimbriata" and "P. schultzi" emit olfactory signals that reduce the risk that any other females, males or juveniles of the same species may contend for the same prey.
_	If a bank has to report that it has lent a large sum to a borrower and so is exposed because of the risk that the borrower might default, thereby leading to the loss of the money of the bank or its depositors, is thus replaced.
_	A makeshift dental dam can be made out of a condom or a latex or nitrile glove, but using a real dental dam is seen as preferable; this is because real dental dams cover a larger area, avoid accidents caused by "slipping" outside the covered area, and avoid the risk that makeshift versions may be accidentally damaged or poked with the scissors during the cutting procedure.
_	If a horse loses the use of one leg temporarily, there is the risk that other legs will break down during the recovery period because they are carrying an abnormal weight load.
_	There is the risk that end users do not understand the issues involved when signing on to a cloud service (persons sometimes don't read the many pages of the terms of service agreement, and just click "Accept" without reading).
_	There was also the risk that it would allow enemy vessels to detect the presence of the ship.
_	The Confession did discuss the basis and role of the papal authority in the Church “but it was decided not to incorporate a statement of the Lutheran position on the papacy in the confession in order to avoid upsetting Charles V and running the risk that he might simply refuse to negotiate with the Lutheran part at the Diet”.
_	This approach results generally in more effective hashing functions, but with the risk that a weakness of such a function will be eventually used to find collisions.
_	Throughout the proceedings, Syvret claimed that identifying "Nurse M" was justified in the public interest "to get the authorities moving in relation to minimising the risk that Nurse M presents" and "to alert the Jersey public to the risk" Nurse M presented (in particular to avoid his being employed as a nurse in a private care home).
_	Healy and his supporters have claimed that this withdrawal was due to Healy giving a speech and publishing a paper claiming that the SSRI antidepressant fluoxetine increases the risk that patients will commit suicide.
_	Since he works free handed, he has to take the risk that he may not succeed on the first round.
_	The memory confusion protocol is a technique used by social psychologists to discover whether subjects are categorizing individuals into groups and, if so, what characteristics they are using to do so – without the knowledge of the subjects, in order to reduce the risk that subjects will try to conceal their reasons.
_	Paragraph 9 also states that the purpose of setting performance materiality is to reduce the risk that the aggregate total of uncorrected misstatements could be material to the financial statements.
_	For motorists, twin bridges can limit the risk that both directions of traffic will be disrupted by an accident.
_	"Courturier v Hastie" was distinguished because there the parties had both shared the assumption the corn existed, but here CDC had actually promised the tanker existed and therefore had assumed the risk that it did not.
_	They only take conservative approaches, investing on only safe and uncontingent claims, to protect themselves from worst-case scenarios related to the risk that they do not understand, which further deteriorates asset prices and financial market.
_	The goalposts and crossbar were initially only made of squared timber and were always removed after the games, preventing the risk that they could be stolen.
_	However, as there is the risk that the child would lose competence in their native language, which is especially so if the L2 is considered to be of a higher prestige than the native language and is more useful and beneficial to the speaker in more contexts than the other, parents might disapprove L2 acquisition because they see their native language as a form of identity and their heritage and do not want their child to lose it.
_	Thus removing the tumor alone without additional treatment greatly increases the risk that another cancer will form in that testicle.
_	In these circumstances the merging parties are effectively taking the risk that the competition authority will not require them to undo the deal if in due course it is found that the transaction is likely to have an anti-competitive effect.
_	However, giraffes have been known to gallop at 50 km/h (31 mph), despite the risk that they might break a leg or worse, which can be fatal even in a "safe" environment such as a zoo.
_	However, in the opinion of one intellectual property law firm, the team "may be hesitant to sue another for infringing its marks because of the risk that a court could possibly determine that the team has no protectable interest in the name because of its disparaging nature".
_	Giraffes have been known to gallop at , despite the risk that they might break a leg or worse, which can be fatal even in a safe environment such as a zoo.
_	While this theoretically cleared the way for his deportation to Algeria, the risk that he could be tortured if returned prevents the Canada Border Services Agency from removing him from Canada.
_	These fat tails represent the risk that a particular event will occur that appears so unlikely to happen and difficult to predict, that many people choose to ignore its possibility.
_	The defeat of American forces at the Battle of Crysler's Farm and, on 26 October, at the Battle of the Chateauguay ended the American threat to Montreal in the late fall of 1813 and with it the risk that Canada would have been cut into two parts.
_	The acquiring bank accepts the risk that the merchant will remain solvent.
_	Diocletian separated the civil administrative apparatus and the military administrative apparatus in order to mitigate the risk that future generals might attempt to seize the throne through force, and then he reorganized both of them.
_	A stumbling block was that the regeneration equipment at many of the sub-stations along the route was unreliable, and since there was no guarantee that another train would be in the same section to absorb the regenerated energy, there was always the risk that line voltage could exceed 4.1 kV, which would make either the sub-station or the locomotive trip out.
_	But the new strategy also increases the risk that PBGC will not have sufficient assets to cover retirees’ benefit payments when the economy and financial markets are weak.
_	The plaintiff must demonstrate that the defendant's action increased the risk that the particular harm suffered by the plaintiff would occur.
_	He elected to take a full load of the newly arrived Mark 18 electric torpedo rather than take the risk that further production runs of the Mark 14 steam torpedoes might still be defective.
_	But we cannot afford the risk that the Soviet leadership might entertain the illusion that nuclear war could be an option--or its threat a means of coercion--for them."
_	Some experts claim that global health officials have underestimated the risk that pig herds might be a source of new influenza strains, choosing instead to focus on the threat of bird flu.
_	Beatty's father was also unhappy about the match, fearing a repeat of the difficulties he had faced with his own relationship with a married woman, but with the added risk of publicity because both Beatty and Ethel were famous and the risk that Beatty's illegitimacy might be exposed.
_	To minimize the risk that another general might attempt to challenge him, Caesar passed a law which subjected governors to term limits.
_	The loan to value ratio is considered an important indicator of the riskiness of a mortgage loan: the higher the LTV, the higher the risk that the value of the property (in case of foreclosure) will be insufficient to cover the remaining principal of the loan.
_	When news of the emperor's death reached Merobaudes, he sent Sebastianus, who was unaware of Valentinian's death, to a distant posting to ensure that Sebastianus could not use his popularity with the troops to interfere with Merobaudes' plans for the succession, mitigating the risk that Sebastianus might possibly be raised by the troops to the rank of Augustus.
_	HVDC powerflow between separate AC systems can be automatically controlled to support either network during transient conditions, but without the risk that a major power system collapse in one network will lead to a collapse in the second.
_	The pawnbroker assumes the risk that an item might have been stolen.
_	The advantage of the bought deal from the issuer's perspective is that they do not have to worry about financing risk (the risk that the financing can only be done at a discount too steep to market price.)
_	There was also the risk that the formation would become disordered, leading to a confused melee in which pikemen had the vulnerabilities mentioned above.
_	However, with the addition of each tag comes the risk that the native function of the protein may be abolished or compromised by interactions with the tag.
_	The primary drawback to standing castration is the risk that, even with sedation and restraint, the horse may object to the procedure and kick or otherwise injure the individual performing the operation.
_	They would then cut device with a flex, but by the station were advised to abandon this idea, because of the risk that the protester can be hurt.
_	Some bonds cover the risk that multiple losses will occur.
_	One of the difficulties with finger substitution is maintaining correct intonation; when a finger replaces another finger to perform the same pitch, there is the risk that the intonation of the replaced finger may not match that of the initial note.
_	NHTSA stated that the recall was due to the risk that unsecured mats could move forward and trap the accelerator pedal.
_	A study published in 1997 found an inverse association between death from coronary heart disease and frequency of orgasm even given the risk that myocardial ischaemia and myocardial infarction can be triggered by sexual activity.
_	Tudor's plan was to export ice as a luxury good to wealthy members of West Indies and the southern US states, where he hoped they would relish the product during their sweltering summers; conscious of the risk that others might follow suit, Tudor hoped to acquire local monopoly rights in his new markets in order to maintain high prices and profits.
_	Payment orders with conditions may be established after signing of a contract and posting of a letter of credit or other financial instrument with the paying bank but are never put in place prior to contract execution because of the risk that the contract will not materialize.
_	The injured employee presumably assumed the risk that even the superintendent might be grossly negligent.
_	After the cancellation of the 2008 event due to the 2007-08 writer's strike, plus the risk that a threatened actor's strike would imperil the Oscars, and a star-studded presidential inauguration scheduled 5 days after, the 66th Golden Globe Awards were more glamorous than usual, with many stars choosing unique couture gowns that might normally have been reserved for the Oscars.
_	Vijay Kannan, the founder of the See Your Lung Campaign, said that people do not realize the risk that they are putting themselves and others by using motor vehicles.
_	Or they can wait until they actually get sued, but then they run the risk that the claim will be denied because it should have been reported back when the underlying accident first occurred.
_	For her mother, a mestizo and poor woman, the birth of Chiquinha was a very difficult, in part because of the risk that the father would not recognize the paternity of her daughter.
_	These findings are based on decades of data, and control for cohort groups; the data avoids the risk that the drops in happiness during midlife are due to populations' unique midlife experiences, like a war.
_	To minimize the risk that another general might attempt to challenge him, Caesar passed a law which subjected governors to term limits of no more than two years in office.
_	Dr. Tom Inglesy, the CEO and director of the Center for Health Security at the Johns Hopkins Bloomberg School of Public Health and an internationally recognized expert on public health preparedness, pandemic and emerging infectious disease said in 2017 that the lack of an internationally standardized approval process that could be used to guide countries in conducting public health experiments for resurrecting a disease that's already been eradicated increases the risk that the disease could be used in bioterrorism.
_	This created the risk that parents would forever lose their children if they sent them to foreign countries.
_	Lister asks Rimmer where the disc which contains Kochanski's hologram has been hidden so that Lister could go on a date with Kochanski, but Rimmer refuses to switch his own disc off to bring back Kochanski for an evening due to the risk that Rimmer's hologram wouldn't be turned on again.
_	The federal government decided to provide a maximum of $14 million CAD to the Oujé-Bougoumou to begin their new village, but after much internal discussion and consultation with the elders, and despite the risk that they might not get another offer as other first nations had not gotten after refusing a government offer, Abel Bosum refused the offer on behalf of the Oujé-Bougoumou.
_	First is the risk that the functions overlap, evolve into silos, create misunderstanding internally and externally and act at cross purposes.
_	Ryti, Mannerheim, Minister of Defence Walden and chief of staff Heinrichs decided October 23 that information concerning Finnish defence plans of Lappland could be given to the Wehrmacht to gain goodwill, even with the risk that they could be forwarded to the Soviet Union.
_	In a television interview, the EU Advocate General Pedro Cruz Villalón highlighted the risk that the retained data might be used illegally in ways that are "potentially detrimental to privacy or, more broadly, fraudulent or even malicious".
_	In addition to assessing the market-related risks that may arise from an investment, investors commonly employ operational due diligence to assess the risk that error or fraud at a hedge fund might result in loss to the investor.
_	So cohabitation evolved between 1998 and 1999, when the State Duma twice refused to appoint Viktor Chernomyrdin as Prime Minister, but it was felt that to have held early elections was dangerous because of the risk that the opposition would strengthen its numbers and perhaps and gain the majority which would have lead to even more complex relations between the Parliament and the President.
_	Laubenstein developed appendicitis in 1984 and was afraid to undergo surgery because of the risk that general anesthesia would pose to her lungs, already compromised from polio.
_	Low (as opposed to zero or negative) inflation reduces the severity of economic recessions by enabling the labor market to adjust more quickly in a downturn, and reduces the risk that a liquidity trap prevents monetary policy from stabilizing the economy.
_	At 4.45pm, Leslie's division had still not landed because of strong flood currents and adverse winds but Cameron—concerned about the onset of darkness and the risk that his enemy would again escape—decided to launch his southward frontal attack.
_	Interest rate risk is the risk that arises for bond owners from fluctuating interest rates.
_	A credible commitment to low levels of inflation and a stable debt reduces the risk that the value of the debt will be eroded by higher levels of inflation or default in the future, allowing debt to be issued at a lower nominal interest rate.
_	The drop-kicking team might attempt to gain possession by executing a short kick and have their players attempt to reach the ball before the other team does, but this carries the risk that the other team could gain possession very close to the try-line.
_	Stewardship cessation will occur hopefully in a planned manner, where the operator will move the satellite to a somewhat higher orbit to minimise the risk that the satellite will be a collision hazard to other satellites in the geostationary arc (graveyard burn).
_	The common name originates from the risk that an infection in this space can spread directly to the thorax, and, due to being a space continuous on the left and right, can furthermore allow infection to spread easily to either side.
_	However, there is still the risk that no wheat will be available because of events unspecified by the contract, such as the weather, or that one party will renege on the contract.
_	If a bank were to offer large volumes of mortgages at fixed rates but to derive most of its funding from deposits (or other short-term sources of funds), the bank would have an asset–liability mismatch due to interest rate risk: in this case, it would be running the risk that the interest income from its mortgage portfolio would be less than it needed to pay its depositors.
_	The idea was to reduce the risk that the authorities might be induced by inadvertent nonconformist actions to investigate the identity more closely.
_	Developing entirely new hydrogen-burning stages for the entire "stack" would increase the risk that a failure of any one of the components could disrupt the entire program.
_	As the tugboat approached the Bosphorus, Turkey denied permission for the ship to pass through, citing the risk that a gust of wind would turn the ship widthwise and block the entire strait.
_	The European Securities and Markets Authority (ESMA) notes high risks associated with ICOs and the risk that investors may lose all of their cash.
_	Although all these facilities at Yongbyon were to be under safeguards, there was always the risk that at some stage, the DPRK would withdraw from the NPT and use the plutonium for weapons.
_	It characterises the risk that the Government is prepared for GIC to take in its long-term investment strategies.
_	In the past, sharing file space with a jail increased the risk that the books were reduced to ashes.
_	In exchange, the sector assumes the risk that it will take some time for assets to return to the prices at which they were bought, with a distant cut-off set beyond which the institutions will assume the drop in value.
_	If the fetus progresses to full term, there is the risk that it will have head trauma from the pressure applied to the head while being delivered.
_	Butalbital is not suggested as a first-line treatment for headache because it impairs alertness, brings risk of dependence and addiction, and increases the risk that episodic headaches will become chronic.
_	However, there was always the risk that a new head would fail to bake, or over-bake, thus resulting in a deformed or deficient head.
_	Since there was no guarantee that another train would be in the same section to absorb the regenerated energy, there was always the risk that line voltage could exceed 4.1 kV which would make either the sub-station or the locomotive trip out.
_	Alice Corporation ("Alice") owned four patents on electronic methods and computer programs for financial-trading systems on which trades between two parties who are to exchange payment are settled by a third party in ways that reduce "settlement risk"—the risk that one party will perform while the other will not.
_	In "General Dynamics", the Court held that the same logic applied outside the espionage context, with the limitation that “[b]oth parties—the government no less than petitioners—must have assumed the risk that state secrets would prevent the adjudication of claims of inadequate performance."
_	These criminal penalties are in addition to the risk that the equity seller will rescind and thereby jeopardize the encumbrancer's interest in the property.
_	Realtors fear that this proximity will heighten the risk that the seller may ask the Realtor to absorb the fee, thus reducing the commission.
_	The markup must be high enough to cover the retailer's expense of "housing" a garment on a rack or a shelf for anywhere from a few days to an entire season, plus the risk that some garments will inevitably have to be marked down to cost to get them out of the store.
_	I was just taking the risk that he might not get it, you know.
_	This is the risk that a given security or asset cannot be traded quickly enough in the market to prevent a loss (or make the required profit).
_	Skewness risk in financial modeling is the risk that results when observations are not spread symmetrically around an average value, but instead have a skewed distribution.
_	Goodlad played no part of the 2007–08 season, and announced his retirement on 2 January 2008 after it emerged that his Achilles tendon injury would need further surgery – surgery which carried the risk that he would have to use a wheelchair for the rest of his life.
_	The Court also explicitly upheld the "discriminatory effect" prong of Section 5, stating that even though the Fifteenth Amendment directly prohibited only intentional discrimination, Congress could constitutionally prohibit unintentional discrimination to mitigate the risk that jurisdictions may engage in intentional discrimination.
_	Given the risk that Chicago might not become the transportation hub of the Midwest, values immediately after the crash appear justifiable.
_	The Insurance Cycle affects all areas of insurance except life insurance, where there is enough data and a large base of similar risks (i.e. people) to accurately predict claims, and therefore minimise the risk that the cycle poses to business.
_	This avoided the risk that debt might become repayable at some future point just when the government needed to borrow more, and could be forced into paying higher interest rates.
_	For example, the choice of not storing sensitive information about customers can be an avoidance for the risk that customer data can be stolen.
_	Pressler was also the sponsor of the "Pressler Amendment", which banned most economic and military assistance to Pakistan unless the President certified on an annual basis that "Pakistan does not possess a nuclear explosive device and that the proposed United States assistance program will reduce significantly the risk that Pakistan will possess a nuclear explosive device."
_	Sulla also wanted to reduce the risk that a future general might attempt to seize power as he himself had done.
_	Publishers of SPF FAIL policies must accept the risk that their legitimate email are being rejected or bounced.
_	To repair psiberweb and save Skolia from Eubian invasion, Soz’s father Eldrinson has to join the Dyad, expanding it to a Triad with the risk that this could kill either him or one of the other Triad members.
_	Naloxone is poorly absorbed when taken by mouth and it is added to decrease the risk that people will misuse the medication by injection.
_	They will also typically have hook extensions to allow the end of the hook to be also driven into the ground, providing a second ground contact point, to reduce the risk that the peg may turn in the ground under tension and allow the rope it is holding to slip off the hook.
_	LIS's are language-agnostic; they mitigate the risk that a certain language binding might reduce compatibility with other languages.
_	Archivists, therefore, prefer to distribute copies of historical material as widely as possible, to reduce the risk that all copies are destroyed and the object be lost forever.
_	With the risk that the land was deserted, the Spanish Crown sold properties to all persons interested in colonised territories creating large farms and possession of mines.
_	Discussing the study in 2013, the authors ask if such political divisions distract decision-makers from confronting the risk that climate change presents to businesses and the economy.
_	This engine location also freed up space under the nose, allowing designers to use tricycle gear, thereby elevating the engine exhaust path and reducing the risk that the hot blast would damage the aircraft carrier deck.
_	Opioids are contraindicated as a first-line treatment for headache because they impair alertness, bring risk of dependence, and increase the risk that episodic headaches will become chronic.
_	When hunting, mature females of "P. africana", "P. fimbriata", "P. labiata", and "P. schultzi" emit olfactory signals that reduce the risk that any other females, males or juveniles of the same species may contend for the same prey.
_	That is why people want to see the world during a giddy, heart-rending leap of death high from above, through a strange perspective lasting only a wink of a moment - despite the risk that the salto mortale might not succeed, the head of the daring jumper being crushed against the paved street.
_	Further concern comes from members of the medical community who warn of the risk that the antibiotics used in the production of many GEOs may give rise to more resistant strains of bacteria.
_	The O-lock facilitates outdoor parking, by reducing the risk that someone can steal the bike by quickly riding off on it.
_	For Margaret, returning to France was dangerous with the risk that the Spanish would capture her.
_	While the presence of undeclared meat was not a health issue, the scandal revealed a major breakdown in the traceability of the food supply chain, and the risk that harmful ingredients could have been included as well.
_	Even more important, the system allows for two harvests a year, reducing the risk that a single crop failure will lead to famine.
_	For example, a property insurance company may agree to bear the risk that a particular piece of property (e.g., a car or a house) may suffer a specific type or types of damage or loss during a certain period of time in exchange for a fee from the policyholder who would otherwise be responsible for that damage or loss.
_	Such a woman, it is said, should not marry again, because marrying her carries the risk that her next husband may also die ("i.e.", she will become the "cause" of his death because her marriage to her two previous husbands ended when they died.)
_	Because of his claustrophobia and the risk that he would panic and block the escape of others behind him he was not allowed to take part in the mass escape attempt, which is today known as "The Great Escape".
_	As in most tanks of that generation, the internal ammunition supply is not shielded, increasing the risk that any enemy penetration of the fighting compartment could cause a catastrophic secondary explosion.
_	There is also the risk that the running back could fumble if he is hit as he pitches the ball.
_	In addition, the use of Dexatrim or other OTC weight-loss supplements presents a possible factor in establishing disruptive eating patterns, increases the risk that individuals will use these OTC supplements in lieu of seeking proper medical and nutritional consultation, and presents increased psychological risks associated with unsuccessful weight-loss attempts.
_	The court appointed guardian testified that because of the risk that Charlie was in pain, and the low chance that the treatment would work, it was in his best interests to withdraw mechanical ventilation.
_	If testing shows that parent is a "CFTR" gene mutation carrier, the other parent is tested to calculate the risk that their children will have CF.
_	Sulla also wanted to reduce the risk that a future general might attempt to seize power, as he himself had done.
_	It tells us that we need to better prepare the society to understand the risk that offender's hold.
_	Renault however decided to provide each with a different suspension type, to lower the risk that his design would be found wanting.
_	Bones may be broken around the foramen magnum, the hole in the base of the skull through which the brain stem exits and becomes the spinal cord, creating the risk that blood vessels and nerves exiting the hole may be damaged.
_	Firstly, there was the "chilling effect" of such claims, making witnesses reluctant to give frank evidence or to provide expert evidence at all; secondly, the risk that an expert witness would be reluctant to comply with his paramount duty to the court if to do so involved giving evidence contrary to his client's interest with a risk of being sued for doing so.
_	Since there is an inverse relationship between risk and rate of return, the potential return is limited by the risk that public funds are permitted to take.
_	Because of the proximity of the M60 motorway and the risk that deep excavations might damage it, seven of the final settling tanks were built above ground.
_	Also shared service centers should not report to their corresponding corporate staff department (with the exception of the financial shared service center) as this creates the risk that the corporate staff department uses the shared service centers to deploy functional authorities.
_	Recycling rinse water from the semiconductor manufacturing process has been discouraged by many manufacturing engineers for decades because of the risk that the contamination from the chemical residue and particles may end up back in the UPW feed water and result in product defects.
_	International investors entering into a joint venture minimize the risk that comes with an outright acquisition of a business.
_	In drinking water, the higher the turbidity level, the higher the risk that people may develop gastrointestinal diseases.
_	There is always the risk that a car accident will affect other road users; for example, a car that brakes abruptly or swerves to avoid a suicidal pedestrian may collide with something else on the road.
_	Because of her commitment to maintaining equal access to the university for women, Talbot was concerned about the risk that a breach of decorum on the part of female students might give the administration an excuse to limit access.
_	These addicts were often ashamed of their drug abuse and the risk that they should introduce others in drug addiction was low.
_	As a result, it is the issuing bank who bears the risk that is linked with non-payment of the buyer.
_	Younger women do not understand the risk that STDs can pose to them.
_	Low (as opposed to zero or negative) inflation reduces the severity of economic recessions by enabling the labor market to adjust more quickly in a downturn, and reduces the risk that a liquidity trap prevents monetary policy from stabilizing the economy.
_	Included were a number of large well-armed ships, whose owners knew the risk that ran their ships taking part in this bellicose endeavor.
_	The proliferation of interaction terms increases the risk that some hypothesis test will produce a false positive by chance.
_	It held that Amalgamated had taken on the risk that the building could be listed.
_	In 1902, following the death of Caleb Adkins, the house and grounds were put up for sale, with the risk that it would be demolished for building houses on the estate.
_	When hunting, mature females of "P. fimbriata", "P. africana", "P. labiata", and "P. schultzi" emit olfactory signals that reduce the risk that any other females, males or juveniles of the same species may contend for the same prey.
_	Banks are taking the risk that the home will not sell for more than is owed against it if they must foreclose on it.
_	"In vitro" assays have been developed to understand the risk that pre-clinical drug candidates might cause CRS and guide dosing for Phase I trials, and regulatory agencies expect to see results of such tests in investigational new drug applications.
_	With that comes the risk that a private money loan may not be re-paid on time or at all without legal action.
_	Declining to discuss details about his religion also reduced the risk that doctrinal differences will alienate evangelical Christian voters.
_	Museums may fly their aircraft in air shows or other aviation related events, accepting the risk that flying them entails.
_	POWs were shot because they were circumcised, and therefore might be Jewish; it was felt to be safer to simply shoot all circumcised POWs rather run the risk that a Jewish POW might escape execution by claiming to be a Muslim.
_	The transactions must occur "simultaneously" to avoid exposure to market risk, or the risk that prices may change on one market before both transactions are complete.
_	While hunting, mature females of "P. africana" emit olfactory signals that reduce the risk that any other females, males or juveniles of the same species may contend for the same prey.
_	Nick Bostrom's 2014 book "" sketches out Good's argument in detail, while citing writing by Yudkowsky on the risk that anthropomorphizing advanced AI systems will cause people to misunderstand the nature of an intelligence explosion.
_	The judges were presumably referring to the risk that Parliament would use the power to dilute the provincial representation in the Senate, undermining one of its fundamental features.
_	People who volunteer to assist nonprofit organizations or government agencies or programs run the risk that their actions, while well-intentioned, may cause harm to another.
_	In some jurisdictions, like California, third party coverage also contains a third duty, the duty to settle a reasonably clear claim against the policyholder within policy limits, in order to avoid the risk that the policyholder may be hit with a judgment in excess of the value of the policy (which a plaintiff might then attempt to satisfy by writ of execution on the policyholder's assets).
_	In the case of nonseminomas that appear to be stage I, surgery may be done on the retroperitoneal/paraaortic lymph nodes (in a separate operation) to accurately determine whether the cancer is in stage I or stage II and to reduce the risk that malignant testicular cancer cells that may have metastasized to lymph nodes in the lower abdomen.
_	Because enormous amounts of bacteria are being cultivated each day in large fermentation vats, the risk that bacteriophage contamination rapidly brings fermentations to a halt and cause economical setbacks is a serious threat in these industries.
_	Of course, this bears the risk that this barrier to entry will dissuade international competitors from entering the market (see Deregulation).
_	An example was an NHS project where the risk that clinical cost savings might not be achieved was theoretically transferred to the private sector.
_	The waiter is essentially an entrepreneur, taking the risk that customers will sufficiently compensate him for the labor he provides, while the customers are under no legal obligation to do so.
_	This makes the risk twofold; the risk that the stag does not appear, and the risk that another hunter takes the kill.
_	Responding to Schufa’s expansion into new areas of business such as the housing and insurance sectors, as well as debt collection, the German Data Protection Office and several issued a joint press statement on 15 May 2003 in which they warned against the risk that Schufa was evolving into a privately controlled central database.
_	In its October 2009 peak oil report, the Government-supported UK Energy Research Centre warned of the risk that 'rising oil prices will encourage the rapid development of carbon-intensive alternatives which will make it difficult or impossible to prevent dangerous climate change and stated that 'early investment in low-carbon alternatives to conventional oil is of considerable importance' in avoiding this scenario.
_	A stumbling block was that the regeneration equipment at many of the sub-stations along the route was unreliable and since there was no guarantee that another train would be in the same section to absorb the regenerated energy, there was always the risk that line voltage could exceed 4.1 kV, which would make either the sub-station or the locomotive trip out.
_	While amplification of positive effects would occur, there is also the risk that amplification of possible negative effects would also occur.
_	The Model Law recognises the risk that certain provisions of one state's insolvency laws may be repugnant to another state, and creates a public policy exception in relation to foreign laws, although the guidance notes express the hope that this would be utilised rarely in commercial insolvency matters.
_	The optimum target for the night fighter was the wing fuel tanks, not the fuselage or bomb bay, because of the risk that exploding bombs would damage the attacker.
_	On job training is required for most jobs, and the cost of on job training might be too large for companies, given the risk that some employees might quit only after working for one shift.
_	Fitch Ratings reported on 16 December that the (political) "standoff" had led to "greater the risk that political uncertainty will raise demand for foreign currency, causing additional reserve losses and increasing the risk of disorderly currency movement".
_	Its implementation at the time was impractical for logistical reasons and the risk that variolation would spread smallpox.
_	However, physicians in the United States have warned that squirrel brains should not be eaten, because of the risk that they may carry Creutzfeldt–Jakob disease.
_	Local demands to re-route the rails around the town also remain unaddressed, despite the risk that oil shipments could resume by the start of 2016.
_	Despite, and partly because of, the risk that McGovern might not come back from combat, the McGoverns decided to have a child, and Eleanor became pregnant.
_	Residual risk is the risk that is left over after all reliability activities have finished, and includes the un-identified risk—and is therefore not completely quantifiable.
_	Doctors under threat of being sued for wrongful birth have an incentive to be vigilant in detecting the risk that prospective parents will have a congenitally diseased child, in disclosing any risks to the prospective parents, and in recommending various tests to determine the risk or existence a congenital abnormality.
_	In early 2005, AOL stated its intention to implement a certified email system called Goodmail, which will allow companies to send email to users with whom they have pre-existing business relationships, with a visual indication that the email is from a trusted source and without the risk that the email messages might be blocked or stripped by spam filters.
_	This dynamic increases the risk that suppliers will seek to excuse their non-performance (including service level failures) on the basis that another supplier's failure was the root cause.
_	The interaction of the two drugs may also increase the risk that side effects will occur.
_	Thus, market-makers who pay for order flow can capture the spread while reducing the risk that the spread is too narrow to adequately compensate them for the risk of loss.
_	In dealing with the liquidity gap, the bank main concern is to deal with a surplus of long-term assets over short-term liabilities and thus continuously to finance the assets with the risk that required funds will not be available or into prohibitive level.
_	He was aware of the risk that the American public might reject his proposals, and he did not want to repeat Woodrow Wilson's struggle to convince the Senate to approve American membership in the League of Nations.
_	Application of the principle modifies the status of innovation and risk assessment: it is not the risk that must be avoided or amended, but a potential risk that must be prevented.
_	UN Special Rapporteur on the right to food, Olivier De Schutter, has questioned the insistence on titling as a means to protect security of tenure based on the risk that titling will undermine customary forms of tenure and insufficiently protect the rights of land users that depend on the commons, as well as the fear that titling schemes may lead to further reconcentration of land ownership, unless strong support is provided to smallholders.
_	Traditionally, banks lend to borrowers under tight lending standards, keep loans on their balance sheets and retain credit risk—the risk that borrowers will default (be unable to repay interest and principal as specified in the loan contract).
_	The exploitation through sex trafficking and forced prostitution increases the risk that a woman in Mexico will experience gender-based violence.
_	In addition, the lender faces the risk that the value of the property underlying the mortgage could drop in value to below the outstanding balance on the mortgage; if this event induces the borrower to default due to moral hazard, the lender must not only incur the costs of implementing a foreclosure but also must sell the property at a price that fails to recoup the lender's investment.
_	List helps to mitigate the risk that supercookies pose.
_	With regard to their requirement to preserve data and resulting expected efforts to keep evidence for potential liability requests on inaccurate ID, CEPIS sees the risk that trust service providers could create and store log entries of all authentication processes.
_	Cross-border and Interoperable electronic health record systems make confidential data more easily and rapidly accessible to a wider audience and increase the risk that personal data concerning health could be accidentally exposed or easily distributed to unauthorised parties by enabling greater access to a compilation of the personal data concerning health, from different sources, and throughout a lifetime.
_	A crash bar's fast-acting mechanism reduces the risk that a rushing crowd might suddenly become a logjam at the exits.
_	He and four men had drained the slip and a watch was kept on the works by night, because of the risk that further slippage might occur, but the watch was stopped after the slip had been made good.
_	It became common in advanced industrial economies in the 1970s and 1980s, as a result of new trends in economic thinking about the inefficiencies of government regulation, and the risk that regulatory agencies would be controlled by the regulated industry to its benefit, and thereby hurt consumers and the wider economy.
_	Once in place, democratic institutions—even partial ones—reduce the likelihood of armed conflict and all but eliminate the risk that it will lead to geno/politicide."
_	Merkel explains that two aspects determine the risk that more similar bugs will cause vulnerabilities.
_	34p goes to the company that takes on the risk that the project may fail.
_	However, the 2014 international sanctions on Russia decreased Russia's financial connections with the broader financial world, which in turn lowered the risk that an ailing Russian economy would affect the worldwide economy.
_	This evasion approach introduces the risk that an adversary who owns many nodes could "selectively" disrupt only groups the adversary has not "completely" compromised, thereby "herding" participants toward groups that may be functional precisely because they are completely compromised.
_	This unification brought the risk that the European institutions would leave Luxembourg, and be situated in a sole headquarters.
_	Because of the risk that the bull may drive the staff into the handler if the bull misbehaves many handlers prefer to avoid their use nowadays.
_	Flaws in the design of the pool's governance can create the risk that one member can break the common cause of the group.
_	On the other hand, attempting VBAC reduces the risk that the child will have respiratory problems after birth such as infant respiratory distress syndrome (IRDS), as rates are estimated at 2–3% with planned VBAC and 3–4% with ERCS.
_	Duflot was considered the early favorite, though she initially opposed holding a primary, aware of the risk that she might lose it; and highlighted her experience in government.
_	There is also the risk that the code traps or prevents too many exceptions, potentially resulting in unnoticed, incorrect results.
_	To avoid the risk that B-29s might be wasted on the battlefields when they would be much more useful against the Japanese home islands, the Joint Chiefs approved the establishment in April 1944 of the Twentieth Air Force, setting the stage for Operation Matterhorn.
_	expressed concern over the potential impact on inflation, national debt and the risk that a too large stimulus will create an unsustainable recovery.
_	Their appeal was rejected on the grounds that they themselves had taken on the risk that some licenses may be denied, and by thereby not allocating a license to their chartered steam trawler, the frustration was self-induced.
_	There is also the risk that the bucket can tip over and spill its contents; an improved system encloses the bucket inside something which is securely bolted to the floor.
_	The project researchers felt this questionable new rift might turn towards the shelf edge, compounding the risk that it would "continue on to Bawden ice rise" which is considered "a crucial point of stabilization for Larsen C Ice Shelf.
_	Meng Die is powerful enough to become a master of a city in her own right, and aggressive enough that her former master was happy to "loan" her to Jean-Claude, thereby reducing the risk that she would try to seize her former master's territory for herself.
_	Therefore, anyone who buys a unit in a common interest development with knowledge of its owners association's discretionary power accepts 'the risk that the power may be used in a way that benefits the commonality but harms the individual.'"
_	Conditioning on slippery ground increases the risk that the horse will slip and have a soft-tissue injury.
_	This increases the risk that newly built systems will be failing.
_	The authors noted that 'forecasts that delay a peak in conventional oil production until after 2030 are at best optimistic and at worst implausible' and warn of the risk that 'rising oil prices will encourage the rapid development of carbon-intensive alternatives that will make it difficult or impossible to prevent dangerous climate change and that 'early investment in low-carbon alternatives to conventional oil is of considerable importance' in avoiding this scenario.
_	Risk arbitrage profits materialize through the narrowing of the spread, which exists as a result of the risk that the merger will not be consummated at its original terms.
_	While in Syria making "Not Anymore: A Story of Revolution", the Syrian government broadcast on numerous Syrian State Television channels that VanDyke was a terrorist who had come to fight against the government as part of the rebel Free Syrian Army, greatly increasing the risk that VanDyke would be kidnapped or assassinated in Syria.
_	They also mentioned that pederasty was not rare, "but was considered dangerous because of the risk that the boy will become pregnant.
_	Piłsudski used Hitler's rise to power and international isolation of Germany's new regime as an opportunity to reduce the risk that Poland would become the first victim of German aggression or of a Great Power deal (especially the Four Power Pact).
_	As to Eastern Airlines, the review determined that the acrimonious relationships between the company and its unions increased the risk that safety could be jeopardized.
_	“The four decision criteria to be used... in assessment of a public health event are: (1) the seriousness of the event’s public health impact; (2) the unusual or unexpected nature of the event; (3) the risk of international disease spread; and (4) or the risk that travel or trade restrictions will be imposed by other countries.
_	The birth reduced the risk that the king's realm would pass to his son-in-law's family, which might have occurred if the marriage of Matilda and Geoffrey had proved childless.
_	A. M. Best defines "country risk" as the risk that country-specific factors could adversely affect an insurer's ability to meet its financial obligations.
_	According to Hill (2012), "this can be done by fixing a flaw that creates an exposure to risk or by putting compensatory controls in place that either reduce the likelihood of the weakness actually causing damage or reduce the impact if the risk that is associated with the flaw actually materialized.
_	Work was interrupted in 2001, because of the risk that the cave was about to collapse, in part as a result of the excavation itself, but the cave was stabilized in 2002, and a protecting wire netting of steel was set up to prevent chips of stone from falling.
_	He forms an emotional bond with the Terminator, coming to regard it as a father figure, and does not want the Terminator to destroy himself at the end of the film, despite the Terminator's warning that allowing him to continue existing creates the risk that his chip could be used to recreate Skynet at some future date.
_	Prepayment risk is the risk that the term of the security will vary according to differing rates of repayment of principal by borrowers (repayments from refinancings, sales, curtailments, or foreclosures).
_	Thus, while the obligation of making one's produce available to the public and permitted to all takers can be performed in such a way as to minimize the risk that this availability will actually be utilized, this risk cannot be entirely eliminated.
_	Schools may admit a student who failed in language subjects, providing that the school would bear the risk that he/she may not pass again in the following year, not allowing them to sit for the HKALE.
_	"Calliandra calothyrsus" should not be used in grazing regions only, because the risk that animals destroy the tree bark is high, which leads to a high tree mortality.
_	Participants were often graduate students who knew what sort of results to expect, and there was the risk that the experimenters' expectations would be transmitted to subjects by unconscious cues.
_	The main shortcoming of judging the quality (sensitivity, specificity) of a CAA system based on retrospective performance data alone comes from the risk that the approaches used can overestimate the true performance of a given system.
_	The BIA determined that the alien's criminal acts were not to be judged against the risk that he will be persecuted if he returned to his home country.
_	It was Diocletian who initially divided the military administrative apparatus and the civil administration in order to mitigate the risk that future imperial governors or Praetorian Prefects might attempt to seize the throne through force, and then he reorganized both of them.
_	The lender takes on the risk that the borrower may not repay the money he owes.
_	Freeth wrote that he would, on a monthly basis, remind the Silvertown plant of the risk that the plant would explode, but that it was deemed "worth the risk".
_	Upgrades of software introduce the risk that the new version (or patch) will contain a bug, causing the program to malfunction in some way or not to function at all.
_	While the British could muster troops to the south of the lake, and the Belgians had troops to the north, neither could push into German East Africa because of the risk that the Germans would use their boats to transport troops across the lake, and use them to cut their supply and communications lines.
_	She stated she does not want to have biological children because "there's just millions of kids that have no parents" in the world and to avoid the risk that they might inherit her depression.
_	The Scots, however, refused permission, because of the risk that she would never return.
_	Historian Niall Ferguson described the risk that foreign investors would demand higher interest rates as the U.S. debt levels increase over time in a November 2009 interview.
_	However, British Foreign Minister Edward Grey realized the risk that small conflicts between Paris and Berlin could escalate out of control.
_	Martine Aubry, the leader of the French Socialist Party, warned of the risk that the protests could spread further to mainland France in an interview with "Le Parisien".
_	There is also the risk that an intimate partner or child may come in contact with the application site and inadvertently dose himself or herself; children and women are highly sensitive to testosterone and can suffer unintended masculinization and health effects, even from small doses.
_	To minimize the risk that dots would become coated with rubber scraped off tires, Translab switched to ceramic round markers in 1966.
_	Following such leads subjects the follower to the risk that an insider is making a buy specifically to increase investor confidence, or is making a sale for reasons unrelated to the health of the company (such as a desire to diversify or pay a personal expense).
_	Valerie raises the child by herself, accepting the risk that the angels may come for her.
_	The Board's role in the criminal justice system is to undertake an assessment of the risk that long-term sentenced offenders might pose to the safety of the community if they were to be released before the end of their sentence.
_	However, there is always the risk that a mob other than the Capone Mob will use family influence or mob power to save that person's mobster.
_	Another criticism is the risk that courts may place too much emphasis on subjective feelings, which may not be a reliable basis for restricting free speech.
_	Disability Insurance, often called DI or disability income insurance, or income protection, is a form of insurance that insures the beneficiary's earned income against the risk that a disability creates a barrier for a worker to complete the core functions of their work.
_	Sellafield has been a matter of consternation in Ireland, with the Irish Government and some of the population concerned at the risk that such a facility may pose to the country.
_	However, the danger of appeasement is the risk that the actions of transgressor will be viewed as being artificial.
_	Jovanović describes in detail the risk that the escapees exposed themselves to, and what reprisals their fellow prisoners could expect.
_	For example, if the specification for a component had to be changed, it would be possible to quickly identify all processes or activities which had been dependent on that specification, reducing the risk that work continues based on out-of-date information.
_	In colder climates, in harsh weather and where winter food supplies may be scarce, they may roost in farm buildings and in barns between hay bales, but they then run the risk that their selected nesting hole may be taken over by some other, earlier-nesting species.
_	When this led to a state of confusion, Dayan ordered full mobilization, and chose to take the risk that he might alert the Egyptians.
_	That is the risk that the lender cannot recover its entire expected return on investment, which in turn includes not only the probability of default, but also any external forces (like a bankruptcy court) that could delay repayment or force the lender to write off any part of the loan.
_	The first was primary assumption of risk, where the defendant owes no duty of care to protect the plaintiff from the risk that caused the injury.
_	Therefore, in areas where GWA operates over tracks owned by others, it is subject to train scheduling set by the owners as well as the risk that the network will not be adequately maintained.
_	Heat networks play a systematic role in the scenario, opening up access to large-scale solar, geothermal and waste heat resources at lower costs than new electricity sources and reducing the risk that the UK will be unable to keep the lights on.
_	In the US, the Bill Emerson Good Samaritan Act of 1996 limited the liability of donors to instances of gross negligence or intentional misconduct, alleviating gleaning from much of the risk that was allegedly hampering the delivery of surplus food from restaurants and dining facilities to emergency food centers.
_	The main issue that most bedside sleeper users and manufacturers must consider is the risk that a baby might fall into a gap between the bedside sleeper and the adult bed mattress, which could cause entrapment injuries and/or strangulation.
_	In many jurisdictions, a party moving for summary judgment takes the risk that, although the judge may agree there are no material issues of fact remaining for trial, the judge may also find that it is the "non-moving" party that is entitled to judgment as a matter of law.
_	Caplan also mentions concerns about possible misdiagnosis risk - the risk that an infant would be incorrectly diagnosed with anencephaly, and also the slippery-slope concern - the concern that other individuals are then at risk for organ donation, such as those in vegetative states or with severe disabilities.
_	The researchers notes that physical activity, which often occurs in open spaces, could increase the risk that these park air pollutants are inhaled, leading to serious health consequences.
_	Smith said the hold was due to the risk that the autopsy's findings would affect witnesses' testimonies, but Hutchinson said it would fuel "suspicions about the LAPD's version of the Ford killing."
_	Sulla also wanted to reduce the risk that a future general might attempt to seize power, as he himself had done.
_	Analysts studying the colony unanimously agreed on two relevant issues: the inability to find a stable home for offenders increased the risk that they would re-offend, and the close proximity of offenders to schools or parks did not increase the possibility that past offenders would re-offend.
_	When hunting, "P. labiata" mature females emit olfactory signals that reduce the risk that any other females, males or juveniles of the same species may contend for the same prey.
_	No two individual "Pterochroza ocellata" are identical in their color pattern or the shape of the wings; this reduces the risk that predators could learn to recognize a fixed visual pattern.
_	In "Teachers," the union had failed to minimize the risk that agency fees might be used for impermissible purposes and had failed to provide agency fee payers with adequate information about how the agency fee was calculated.
_	However, unidentifiable source from Burma film industry reported that the castings had been compelled to play their respective roles in the movie by SPDC, jeopardizing the risk that they might be imposed censorship for at least one year if they ever refused to take part in the film.
_	However, this introduces subjectivity into the results and the risk that the expert would miss something the program saw.
_	In March 2010, during the European Union (EU) Foreign Ministers’ pastoral retreat, Finnish Foreign Minister Alexander Stubb said that there was consensus enough in the EU for imposing unilateral sanctions on Iran for its nuclear activity, as the United Nations (UN) resolution will likely not be ready until June 2010, with the risk that it will not even be passed at that time.
_	The European Tour has always been sensitive to the risk that its best players will leave to play on the PGA Tour for many reasons.
_	There is also the risk that a patient may have an allergic reaction to the medications.
_	By the time she got back to the west, the next summer, the German Communist Party had been replaced by the Socialist Unity Party (SED / "Sozialistische Einheitspartei Deutschlands"), through a contentious merger that within the Soviet occupation zone incorporated the more moderately left-wing Social Democratic Party (SPD) to form a unified party of the broad left, thereby reducing the risk that a resurgent Nazi Party might one day rise again and again exploit political splintering of the political left to re-establish a right-wing dictatorship.
_	Foreign exchange risk is the risk that the exchange rate will change unfavorably before payment is made or received in the currency .
_	In doing so he realised that they were close to the highly illuminated and populated coast of Jacksonville, and that there was the risk that if he fired, shots that flew over the "Gulfamerica" could hit the shore, putting civilian lives at risk.
_	Legal doctrine also holds that a retailer incurs the risk that merchandise will be destroyed by placing it where customers can handle it and not doing anything to discourage them.
_	In addition, the report authors said many P25 systems change keys too often, increasing the risk that an individual radio on a net may not be properly keyed, forcing all users on the net to transmit in the clear to maintain communications with that radio.
_	The players did not seek injunctions due to the risk that a new two-year period of suspension might need to be served in full if the appeal were unsuccessful.
_	Privacy advocates raised concerns about this practice; concerns included that allowing email content to be read by a machine (as opposed to a person) can allow Google to keep unlimited amounts of information forever; the automated background scanning of data raises the risk that the expectation of privacy in email usage will be reduced or eroded; information collected from emails could be retained by Google for years after its current relevancy to build complete profiles on users; emails sent by users from other email providers get scanned despite never having agreed to Google's privacy policy or terms of service; Google can change its privacy policy unilaterally, and for minor changes to the policy it can do so without informing users; in court cases, governments and organizations can potentially find it easier to legally monitor email communications; at any time, Google can change its current company policies to allow combining information from emails with data gathered from use of its other services; and any internal security problem on Google's systems can potentially expose many – or all – of its users.
_	(Not to do so runs the risk that the ball will hit off-stump, which would not only get the batsman out but leave him looking extremely foolish.)
_	The long and short transactions should ideally occur "simultaneously" to minimize the exposure to market risk, or the risk that prices may change on one market before both transactions are complete.
_	Audit risk is defined as the risk that the auditor will issue a clean unmodified opinion regarding the financial statements, when in fact the financial statements are materially misstated, and therefore do not qualify for a clean unmodified opinion.
_	She is indeed interested in public health education and has developed for high school adolescents educational software based on models for determining the risk that an individual with certain risky sexual behaviors actually would become infected with HIV.
_	From another perspective, the farmer and the miller both reduce a risk and acquire a risk when they sign the futures contract: the farmer reduces the risk that the price of wheat will fall below the price specified in the contract and acquires the risk that the price of wheat will rise above the price specified in the contract (thereby losing additional income that he could have earned).
_	The miller, on the other hand, acquires the risk that the price of wheat will fall below the price specified in the contract (thereby paying more in the future than he otherwise would have) and reduces the risk that the price of wheat will rise above the price specified in the contract.
_	However, he refuses, not wanting to take the risk that something will go wrong.
_	It aims to improve nonspecific immunity of the host to resist the introduction of an agent, or limit the risk that an agent will be sustained in an environment at adequate levels.
_	By the 1930s, local magistrates expressed concern about the tower and the risk that it might fall over onto the grounds of a neighbouring private asylum, the Kent Sanatorium, endangering the patients.
_	Of course, this allows the individual or institution the benefit of holding the asset, while reducing the risk that the future selling price will deviate unexpectedly from the market's current assessment of the future value of the asset.
_	The drawback of having juries rather than judges fix the penalty in capital cases is the risk that they will have no frame of reference for imposing the death penalty in a rational manner.
_	The private nature of his projects and their nature, in the sense that they are an ends unto themselves, and will most likely not survive beyond the lives of their owners, brings with it the risk that Mongiardino’s name may not correspond to anything definite, but true only as evocation of the rich and famous world.
_	The crew and miners worked tirelessly to rescue survivors, fully cognizant of the risk that the "Kent"s magazine might explode at any time.
_	Second, there is the risk that the chance to get the reward will be cut short, perhaps by a predator, also known as a termination risk.
_	The pressure to fulfill Soviet Second and Third Five Year Plan goals was more keen where managers faced the risk that every failure might be interpreted as an act of economic sabotage.
_	Atradius products and services help manage the payment default risks - the risk that a buyer fails to pay for the products or services it buys on trade credit terms.
_	Assessing too low: the risk that the assessed level of control risk based on the sample is less than the true operating effectiveness of the control.
_	If a user's identity is not protected, there are more risks; for example, the risk that private information about users is made public on the internet.
_	Usually traffickers know the risk that they are taking when entering into this business, but continue to do so because of the benefits that they receive.
_	Gillespie confronts Trundel with the knowledge that even though he has escaped a murder charge, he will still have to live with the burden of having his lover and the mother of his son, Eric Delong, murdered and having to live with the risk that Eric would one day confront him over it.
_	Digitalis use may increase the risk that hypokalemia will produce life-threatening arrhythmias.
_	For example, a property insurance company may agree to bear the risk that a particular piece of property (e.g., a car or a house) may suffer a specific type or types of damage or loss during a certain period of time in exchange for a fee from the policyholder who would otherwise be responsible for that damage or loss.
_	There is always the risk that one part of the government may make the covert operations of another part of the government public.
_	As of October 1, 2005, all cigarettes in Canada are manufactured to self-extinguish before burning to the filter, thus reducing the risk that it will start a fire when forgotten or when the smoker falls asleep.
_	Upon presentation of the documents, at the goods will traditionally be in the control of the issuing bank, which provides them security against the risk that the buyer (who had instructed the bank to pay the seller) will repay the bank for making such a payment.
_	Urinals also reduce the risk that male users standing over the UDDT for urination (rather than sitting or squatting) inadvertently urinate into the feces vault or feces container.
_	Since there was no guarantee that another train would be in the same section to absorb the regenerated energy, there was always the risk that line voltage could exceed 4.1 kV, which would make either the sub-station or the locomotive trip out.
_	Then, finally, "General Dynamics Corp. v. United States" held that the same logic applies even outside the espionage context, so long as “[b]oth parties—the government no less than petitioners—must have assumed the risk that state secrets would prevent the adjudication of claims of inadequate performance."
_	Lockheed's design favored the JTF-17A over the GE-4, but there was the risk that GE would win the engine competition and Lockheed would win the SST contract, so they developed new engine pods that could accommodate either engine.
_	There is also the risk that as an investor or fund manager diversifies, their ability to monitor and understand the assets may decline leading to the possibility of losses due to poor decisions or unforeseen correlations.
_	The United States Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) states that circumcision reduces the risk that a man will acquire HIV and other sexually transmitted infections (STIs) from an infected female partner.
_	The "Alice" case involved patents on electronic methods and computer programs for financial-trading systems on which trades between two parties who are to exchange payment are settled by a third party in ways that reduce the risk that one party will perform while the other will not.
_	Genetics may play a role in the risk that a person will develop PTE; people with the ApoE-ε4 allele may be at higher risk for PTE.
_	The government did not go so far as to claim that publication might pose an immediate or inevitable danger, only that it "would substantially increase the risk that thermonuclear weapons would become available or available at an earlier date to those who do not now have them.
_	The longer a thread holds a lock, the greater the risk that the thread will be interrupted by the OS scheduler while holding the lock.
_	Such iterations bear the risk that one additional income generating measure is added after the other, which may reduce the overall effectiveness of each measure.
_	In his view, these matters increased the risk that the government would reject the report However, although some minor changes were made to the report at the suggestion of Lord Perth, one softening the argument that there was nothing in the murder plot, another removing a sentence critical of police indifference to the rule of law, and one removing statements that there was no official expression of regret about burning huts, the British government preferred to attack the Commission's Report rather than amend it.
_	This adversely affects runway safety, as it creates the risk that an airplane taking off or landing will collide with the object.
_	This reduced the risk that they would be flooded by a following sea (i.e. having waves breaking over the stern).
_	He also warned about the risk that foreign investors would demand a higher interest rate to purchase U.S. debt, damaging U.S. growth prospects.
_	The player can place their five (5) into the community pile with hopes of using the three (3) and the five (5) to add to their last remaining card which is an eight (8), but again this runs the risk that the other player(s) will use either the three (3) or five (5) for a match of their own.
_	The "Shetland Bus" was unable to operate only during the very long hours of daylight in the arctic summer, because of the risk that the slow fishing boats would be attacked by patrolling German aircraft.
_	In "Teachers," the union had failed to minimize the risk that agency fees might be used for impermissible purposes and had failed to provide agency fee payers with adequate information about how the agency fee was calculated.
_	On December 2009, FBI Director Robert Mueller appointed William Webster, a former director of the FBI, to establish a commission to conduct an independent review of the FBI's handling of assessing the risk that Hasan posed.
_	While ApoE4 has been found to greatly increase the odds that an individual will develop Alzheimer’s, a 2002 study concluded, that in persons with any combination of ApoE alleles, high serum total cholesterol and high blood pressure in mid-life are independent risk factors which together can nearly triple the risk that the individual will later develop AD.
_	Sometimes the risk that the good is kept is reduced by it being a special model or having signs on it that cannot easily be removed, making it obvious that it is owned by the rental company; this is especially effective for goods used in public places, but even when used at home it may help due to social control.
_	The Supreme Court defined "common authority" as “mutual use of the property by persons generally having joint access or control for most purposes, so that it is reasonable to recognize that any of the co-inhabitants has the right to permit the inspection in his own right and that the others have assumed the risk that one of their number might permit the common area to be searched.”
_	Modern reference management packages can usually be integrated with word processors so that a reference list in the appropriate format is produced automatically as an article is written, reducing the risk that a cited source is not included in the reference list.
_	Prior to the opening of the Games, the International Olympic Committee was keen to play down the risk that athletes faced from pollution; however, the organizing body considered rescheduling of endurance events (such as the cycling road race) if the pollution levels were too high.
_	Imagining what would happen if the law did not have collective insolvency rules, it was argued there would be significant increase in costs as individual creditors attempted to ensure repayment, namely (1) the costs of uncertainty in racing to court to claim one's entitlement, and so higher, duplicated monitoring costs by each creditor before a company goes insolvency (2) the risk that a company would be dismantled bit by bit, when acting together creditors would agree that a company could be kept or sold as a going concern, and (3) higher administrative costs of collecting debts individually, when a collective procedure would save time and money.
_	In certain situations, humans are willing to take the risk that might be involved in violating an access control policy, if the potential benefit that can be achieved outweighs this risk.
_	The likelihood of collecting oil with the cofferdam was uncertain, chief among potential problems was the risk that methane gas escaping from the well would come into contact with cold sea water and form slushy hydrates, essentially clogging the cofferdam with hydrocarbon ice.
_	The prompt landing is a precaution against the risk that another engine will fail later in the flight or that the engine failure that has already occurred may have caused or been caused by other as-yet unknown damage or malfunction of aircraft systems (such as fire or damage to aircraft flight controls) that may pose a continuing risk to the flight.
_	In that 1–1 away draw, the risk that Greece coach Claudio Ranieri took by introducing a previously unseen forward lineup (Charalampos Mavrias, Nikos Karelis and Stefanos Athanasiadis) seemed to pay off in the first half, but the lack of experience told in the second as the Greeks could not hold on to their lead and risked losing all three points, besides the fact that with 24 minutes on the clock the ball fell to Karelis who unleashed a swerving shot from the left that swung its way to the left corner of the Finnish goal for 1–0.
_	Despite, therefore, Lord Reid's assertion in "McGhee" that he could not accept “the distinction drawn … between materially increasing the risk that the disease will occur and making a material contribution to its occurrence”, the distinction is, with respect to his Lordship, a very important one.
_	Although the indirect or multi-tiered holding system has increased settlement speed, thus reducing the risk that the counter-party in the relevant transaction will fail before the transaction is settled, it effectively cuts off the issuer of shares from the shareholders.
_	The NHTSA stated that the recall was due to the risk that unsecured mats could move forward and trap the gas pedal.
_	Proof that the acquittee committed a criminal act as a result of mental illness eliminates the risk that he is being committed for mere idiosyncratic behavior.
_	Kitty Empire of sister publication "The Observer" was more positive, writing that despite the risk that the "atmospheric" album "might not land well", the "voyage into themed purgatory ... is worth it".
_	In addition to receiving a monthly salary, initially $1000 increasing to $1500, he also persuaded the CIA to pay for sham surgery to his arm with a view to preventing the risk that he would have to do military service in Libya, and tried to persuade them to finance a car rental business which at one stage he said he wanted to set up in Malta.
_	Libor submissions be published, but only after three months, to reduce the risk that they would be used as a measure of the submitting banks' creditworthiness.
_	Not reigning over Spain, the risk that the crowns of France and Spain are united in the same person no longer exists and it is considered that, even assuming that the Treaty of Utrecht had been valid, the reasons for which it had aimed to exclude the descendants of Philip V to renounce the succession to the throne of France are no longer met.
_	Wholesalers gets a price and supply guarantee in exchange for taking the risk that they may be paying too much in the long term.
_	In the centre of the island was the main magazine, constructed with thick walls to reduce the risk that a projectile hitting the building would detonate the shells and ammunition stored inside.
_	He did not like the fact that his sister had two English women employed because of the risk that they would act a spies.
_	To minimize the risk that another general might attempt to challenge him, Caesar passed a law which subjected governors to term limits:
_	"She had an amazing ability of free expression, but with the risk that she didn’t recognize the extent.
_	He watches his funeral and visits Ray's widow despite the risk that it could blow his cover.
_	By sperm washing, the risk that a chronic disease in the male providing the sperm would infect the female or offspring can be brought to negligible levels.
_	The review of the Bail Act 2013 by John Hatzistergos investigated whether the risk management approach adequately reduced the risk that the accused would endanger others' safety, commit a serious offence while on bail, interfere with witnesses in their case, or not attend court; whether the Act was balanced in looking after the safety of the community as well as the rights of the accused; and looking at bail decisions.
_	"Ordinarily, when someone acts to another person's detriment based upon a factual judgment, the actor assumes the risk that an impartial adjudicator may come to a different conclusion".
_	It carried the risk that an innocent person might be sent to jail.
_	Therefore, I am not satisfied that the personal risk he may face upon returning to India would outweigh the risk that applicant poses to the public of Canada.
_	Frank Roberts, an official in the Foreign Office's German Department who also dealt with the issue, lightly-heartedly - in spite of the risk that Schwerin had taken in making such a move on the eve of war, which would constitute high treason and a capital crime in the Third Reich's jurisdiction if it was discovered - dismissed the subject-matter of Schwerin's approaches as being an internal matter for the German generals.
_	Critics alleged that employers benefit from this enforced loyalty because it reduced the risk that the H-1B employee might leave the job and go work for a competitor, and that it put citizen workers at a disadvantage in the job market, since the employer has less assurance that the citizen will stay at the job for an extended period of time, especially if the work conditions are tough, wages are lower or the work is difficult or complex.
_	There is also the risk that more than one egg is produced, leading to twins or triplets.
_	The European sovereign debt crisis that unfolded in 2010 sent the euro falling to a four-year low of $1.1877 on June 7, as investors considered the risk that certain Eurozone members may default on their government debt.
_	They all had so-called "technical" backgrounds which, participants believed, reduced the risk that one of them would be a Stasi informer.
_	Inflation risk is the risk that the value of the currency a bond pays out will decline over time.
_	On 5 April, Moody's cut Portugal's debt grade for the second in weeks citing its reason for doing so as "driven primarily by increased political, budgetary and economic uncertainty, which increase the risk that the government will be unable to achieve [its] ambitious deficit reduction targets."
_	Mortgage underwriting is the process a lender uses to determine if the risk (especially the risk that the borrower will default
_	Pieces can be stacked and moved together, on the risk that all but one of them are lost if the stack is placed on a point where one of the pieces have been before.
_	In return for paying a lower loan rate, the borrower takes the interest rate risk: the risk that rates will go up in future.
_	That removes the risk that members decide to sever their share.
_	Valerie raises the child by herself, accepting the risk that the angels may come for her.
_	However, he compromised his ideals to combat a threat that he perceived to be even more menacing: the risk that Southern Rhodesia, if it turned hostile, would fall into the orbit of the National Party government in South Africa.
_	But Charming figures out that Snow can cast the curse and offers his heart, realizing the risk that he is taking to protect their unborn child.
_	Menon found that the resolution of the complaint did not hinge on the risk of any impressions made on a fair-minded observer, but on the risk that by descending into the arena the judge may have impaired his or her ability to evaluate and weigh the arguments from both parties, thus causing the trial to be unfair.
_	In fat-graft breast augmentation procedures, there is the risk that the adipocyte tissue grafted to the breast(s) can undergo necrosis, metastatic calcification, develop cysts, and agglomerate into palpable lumps.
_	According to the Canadian Supreme Court in its 2005 ruling in "Chaoulli v. Quebec", waiting list delays "increase the patient’s risk of mortality or the risk that his or her injuries will become irreparable."
_	This arrangement also made engine access for maintenance and repair difficult and increased the risk that the failure of one engine would contribute to the failure of its pair due to flying debris such as turbine blades; it also increased the complexity of the design of the main spar which had to be routed around the engines.
_	Rather than sending money or goods directly to the other party (which is insecure, as one or the other party must send its item first, at the risk that the other party may not reciprocate), both parties send their items to the escrow service, which holds them until both items are received, then sends each on to the intended recipient.
_	The majority of bovine animals (cattle, bull, cow and ox) in the UK are stunned with a captive-bolt pistol, but this is not permitted by the HFA because of the risk that it may kill the animal.
_	Others found that the bundling of the games was a sensible business decision, highlighting the risk that the sales of "Remastered" could overshadow those of "Infinite Warfare" and result in direct competition between the two.
_	An older Zoe is reunited with the Doctor in his sixth incarnation in "Legend of the Cybermen", where she returns to the Land of Fiction after she is nearly converted by the Cybermen after leaving the Doctor, her attempt to trap the Cybermen in the Land resulting in the universe being endangered by the risk that the Cybermen will harness the computer that controls the Land and use that to influence the imagination of the entire universe.
_	Preventing failure of financial institutions is not part of OSFI's mandate; however, promoting sound business practices helps reduce the risk that financial institutions will fail.
_	He also says that some slams should be bid on the first round of bidding, because of the risk that partner might pass any lower bid.
_	In 1992, the Bradley Mining Co. petitioned the D.C. Circuit Court of Appeals for a review of the EPA's rulemaking listing the mine site on the National Priorities List, asserting that the agency, "acted arbitrarily and capriciously in listing the property because the EPA failed to demonstrate that mercury found in an adjacent lake was caused by mining operations and because the Agency incorrectly calculated the risk that the mercury would contaminate usable ground water."
_	Failure to follow the Generally Accepted Guidelines increases the risk that CRA could deem the RCA not to be an RCA, but rather a Salary Deferral Arrangement (SDA) with substantial tax and penalties payable.
_	If a non-treated or improperly treated item can be confused for a treated item, then there is the risk that they will become mixed up, which, in some areas such as surgery, is critical.
_	The court acknowledged the risk that a prisoner might be wronged deprived of "in forma pauperis" status for lawsuits filed after a third dismissal but before reversal of said dismissal on appeal.
_	Following a hearing on 7 and 8 September 2016, the Court of Arbitration for Sport (CAS) panel found that Sharapova had a reduced perception of the risk that she took while using Mildronate, because (a) she had used Mildronate for around ten years without any anti-doping issue, (b) she had consulted the Russian doctor who prescribed the Mildronate for medical reasons, not to enhance her performance, and (c) she had received no specific warning about the change in status of meldonium from WADA, the ITF, or the WTA.
_	Thus, it is immaterial that the offender failed to foresee or misjudged the risk that his or her act would be seditious.
_	Changing suits puts a player at a distinct disadvantage because the resulting lowered score raises the risk that another player may knock.
_	On 13 January, the GOSH doctors informed Charlie's parents that the brain damage had made the experimental treatment futile, and in light of the risk that he was suffering, they withdrew their support for it.
_	A doctor who fails to adequately disclose the risk that his patients might have an abnormal child, or who fails to properly diagnose an abnormal fetus, is depriving the prospective parents of the chance to make a fully informed procreative decision.
_	To assess the risk that media ownership concentration in a given country may actually hinder media pluralism, the MPM takes into account three specific elements:
_	The representative Calès recalled that "« the people taken en masse, could not, in a large State, exercise by itself its right of legislation, nor handle the ship's wheel of the government »" at the risk that "« the whole of France would see its workshops, its agriculture and its trade abandoned, and the people would be continually assembled into deliberative assemblies" "»".
_	After a corpus callosotomy among others there is the risk that language is temporarily or permanently impaired.
_	Therefore, when considering this code as a program optimization, it may be worth running a few benchmarks to verify that it actually is the fastest code on the target architecture, at the target optimization level, with the target compiler, as well as weighing the risk that the optimized code will later be used on different platforms where it is not the fastest code.
_	Poppy seeds are also prohibited in Taiwan, primarily because of the risk that viable seeds will be sold and used to grow opium poppies.
_	However, in case of warmongering, the prosecution must prove an overt act that evidently increases the risk that Finland is involved in a war or becomes a target for a military operation.
_	All but eleven homeowners took the offer accepting the risk that the upper ridge of possibly reactivating.
_	Because of his experience and knowledge of the Balearics, Peter Martell was appointed head of the fleet, while Guillem de Montcada, who previously had asked the king to allow him to take charge of the mission because of the risk that the enterprise entailed, served as lieutenant, all under the command of James I, who due to his enthusiasm did not allow impositions and rejected the petition.
_	Vakoch noted that many past interstellar messages attempted to be encyclopedic, with the risk that by attempting to explain everything, the message may be unintelligible.
_	This approach is the most common one for replicating databases, despite the risk that if a portion of the log is lost during a failure, the backup might not be in a state identical to the one the primary was in, and transactions could then be lost.
_	This is useful not only for the vision-impaired; they nearly eliminate the risk that, for example, someone might fail to notice a high-value note among low-value ones.
_	This claim has now turned out to be untrue, creating the risk that KPMG will not certify the next accounts.
_	The claim was struck out on a number of grounds, one of which was the risk that every victim of crime might have an action against the police arguing that they should have caught the perpetrators at an earlier stage of their criminal careers.
_	However, the lender faces the risk that the interest rate increase could be unaffordable to the borrower, forcing the borrower into default, in which case it could be necessary to foreclose on the property (with substantial costs of foreclosure).
_	Since there was no guarantee that another train would be in the same section to absorb the regenerated energy, there was always the risk that line voltage could exceed 4.1 kV, which would make either the sub-station or the locomotive trip out.
_	Lister later asks Rimmer where the disc which contains Navigation Officer Kristine Kochanski's (C P Grogan) hologram has been hidden so that Lister could go on a date with her, but Rimmer refuses to switch his own disc off to bring back Kochanski for an evening due to the risk that Lister might not turn Rimmer's hologram on again.
_	Premoving is only recommended if a player is very low on time, as it entails the risk that the opponent will do something unexpected that leads to the premove no longer being an appropriate play.
_	In colder climates, in harsh weather and where winter food supplies may be scarce, they may roost in farm buildings and in barns between hay bales, but they then run the risk that their selected nesting hole may be taken over by some other, earlier-nesting species.
_	Poverty and economic insecurity increase the risk that a person will commit suicide.
_	This form of vote pairing encourages third-party support while minimizing the risk that the more favored major-party candidate will lose electoral votes in the nationwide election (i.e., the "spoiler effect").
_	There is also the risk that through a forest fire or insect outbreak much of the stored carbon in a reforested area could make its way back to the atmosphere.
_	Finally, he points out there is the risk that platform coops will go "bad" becoming an exclusive club for their members (for example, a ride-sharing coop might end up controlled only by drivers who then exploit consumers).
_	Because of the risk that use of tactical nuclear weapons could unexpectedly lead to a rapid escalation of a war to full use of strategic weapons, proposals have been made within NATO and other organizations to place limitations on, and make more transparent, the stockpiling and use of these tactical weapons.
_	In doing this, it seems to me, he voluntarily assumed the risk that his conduct might be adjudged to be sufficient cause for the initial suspension or for subsequent disciplinary action.
_	LCI is concerned about the risk that members of the overseas branches may become to permissive morally, and considers it has a mission to keep them on the "narrow path of salvation."
_	As well as this, the ring does not have an external battery but relies on the wearer's own life-energy, creating the risk that they would destroy themselves if they push themselves too far.
_	There was the risk that the illustrations would be at variance with the corrections subsequently introduced into it.
_	Then "the risk that a government will indiscriminately change the laws, regulations, or contracts governing an investment—or will fail to enforce them—in a way that reduces an investor's financial returns is what we call 'policy risk.'"
_	(Transport Layer Security (TLS) reduces the risk that data in transit may be intercepted by network sniffers and proxy tools.)
_	The UKERC report's authors warn of the risk that 'rising oil prices will encourage the rapid development of carbon-intensive alternatives (such as coal) which will make it difficult or impossible to prevent dangerous climate change' and that 'early investment in low-carbon alternatives to conventional oil is of considerable importance' in avoiding this scenario.
_	There is also the risk that important sectors of society may not be adequately represented.
_	The third form (hold-in-custody) is quite rare, particularly in developing markets, primarily due to the risk that the seller will become insolvent prior to maturation of the repo and the buyer will be unable to recover the securities that were posted as collateral to secure the transaction.
_	Ham passwords are often combined with filtering systems, to counter the risk that a filtering system will accidentally identify a ham message as a spam message.
_	No consideration appears to have been given to the risk that scrapie might be recycled in sheep, or even transmitted to other farm animals.
_	Radio stations had to discontinue programs with audience participation and man on the street interviews because of the risk that an enemy agent might use the microphone.
_	In the agricultural setting, worker protection and public health are always considerations; however, emphasis is placed on reducing the risk that agents under study could escape into the environment.
_	Shouldering the responsibility to protect the bride, bridesmaids were dressed up like the bride to lower the risk that she might be identified and robbed.
_	Although this means more water for the Trinity River, no provision was made for commensurately reducing Central Valley Project water diversions, increasing the risk that Trinity Lake could be drained to "dead pool" in drought years.
_	Groves considered the risk that the Germans might attempt to disrupt the Normandy landings with radioactive poisons was sufficient to warn General Dwight D. Eisenhower and send an officer to brief his chief of staff, Lieutenant General Walter Bedell Smith.
_	Insurability can mean either whether a particular type of loss (risk) can be insured in theory, or whether a particular client is insurable for by a particular company because of particular circumstance and the quality assigned by an insurance provider pertaining to the risk that a given client would have.
_	It encourages parties to form coalition governments, to minimize the risk that an important party tries to block the action of the government by systematically launching referendums.
_	It forces the authorities to listen to all sectors of the population, to minimize the risk that they reject new laws in referendums.
_	In the autumn of 2012, Judges Advocate Elsom and Blackett issued anonymity orders for the Marine defendants due to the risk that, once named, the defendants would become targets for terrorists.
_	It is possible to use prototype testing to reduce the risk that a design may not perform as intended, however prototypes generally cannot eliminate all risk.
_	Aoki, while acknowledging that satire was a legitimate practice, asserted that Silverman's execution of it was not successful because it ran the risk that people would assume she actually subscribed to the racist viewpoint of her character.
_	However, this method can have undesirable cell performance due to the tendency of the catalyst to form agglomerations resulting in non-uniform gas flow in the cell and prohibiting the catalyst from being fully exposed and running the risk that the solvent or carrier liquid may be absorbed into the membrane, both of which impeded proton exchange efficiency.
_	Assessing too high: the risk that the assessed level of control risk based on the sample is greater than the true operating effectiveness of the control.
_	The Borough Amsterdam Centrum declared that the tree had to be cut down on 20 November 2007 due to the risk that it could otherwise fall down.
_	Keeping fish with turtles is usually avoided due to the risk that the turtle will eat the fish.
_	This defensible space reduces the risk that fire will spread from one area to another, or to a structure, and provides firefighters access and a safer area from which to defend a threatened area.
_	Cole's argument is that the primary purpose test applied to acquiring foreign intelligence information when undertaking surveillance was "simply sought to reduce the risk that FISA, which permits searches on less than criminal probable cause, would become an end run around the constitutional requirement of criminal probable cause for searches conducted for criminal law purposes" and that although a secondary criminal purpose may later arise, the agency firstly must primarily gain the order to gain foreign intelligence information.
_	In response to the risk that certain foods pose to those with food allergies, some countries have responded by instituting labeling laws that require food products to clearly inform consumers if their products contain major allergens or byproducts of major allergens among the ingredients intentionally added to foods.
_	However, there was always the risk that a new head would fail to bake, or over-bake, thus resulting in a deformed or deficient head.
_	The NAO said that as the Government is bearing the risk that would normally be borne by equity capital, and as it can appoint, through the SRA, a director who cannot be removed by members, Network Rail is effectively a subsidiary of the Government-controlled SRA.
_	The short barrel, low muzzle velocity and short range also increased the risk that a carronade would eject burning wadding onto nearby combustible materials, increasing the risk of fire.
_	2d Lt. Timmermann led an under-strength squad of men from the 27 AIB onto the west side of the bridge, despite the risk that the bridge could be destroyed with them on it.
_	As these networks are used by banks to settle accounts with each other, rapid or overnight wire transfer of large amounts of money are commonplace; while banks have put checks and balances in place, there is the risk that insiders may attempt to use fraudulent or forged documents which claim to request a bank depositor's money be wired to another bank, often an offshore account in some distant foreign country.
_	In rural Missouri for example, distrust of powerful Eastern influences focused on the risk that Wall Street would lead America into war.
_	For example, in a coal-supply agreement, the mining company may seek to have "geological risk" included as a "force majeure" event; however, the mining company should be doing extensive exploration and analysis of its geological reserves and should not even be negotiating a coal-supply agreement if it cannot take the risk that there may be a geological limit to its coal supply from time to time.
_	Despite his high marks in the draft combine, Felder was still projected to be a late second round draft pick, with the risk that he would perhaps not get drafted altogether.
_	Aircraft designers who install stick pushers recognise that there is the risk that a stick pusher may activate erroneously when not required to do so.
_	For example, an Amish woman might decide that voting for a change is not worth the risk that she may never again talk to her daughter who married a young man from another district.
_	Anticoagulant therapy, as well as disorders with blood clotting can heighten the risk that an intracranial hemorrhage will occur.
_	Prohibition protects the drug cartel insofar as it keeps the distribution in the black market and creates the risk that makes smuggling profitable.
_	Hence, credit freezing should reduce the risk that loans or credit cards will be issued fraudulently.
_	Green wrote that when David French called the work "official but not history", he had used Hart's words out of context, Liddell Hart meaning that by leaving potentially controversial details to be read between the lines, Edmonds created the risk that later historians might use the phrase "official but not history", to describe the volumes.
_	With no insurable interest requirement, the risk that a purchaser would murder the CQV for insurance proceeds would be great.
_	Frank E. Holman testified before the Senate Judiciary Committee that the Bricker Amendment was needed "to eliminate the risk that through 'treaty law' our basic American rights may be bargained away in attempts to show our good neighborliness and to indicate to the rest of the world our spirit of brotherhood."
_	For potential buyers there is always the risk that reviews may be sourced by the vendors themselves or other parties paid to leave a specific type of feedback on a product or service.
_	In fact, the louder the snoring, the greater the risk that it is associated with severe obstructive sleep apnoea.
_	Surety bond companies attempt to predict the risk that an applicant represents.
_	Nerve-sparing surgery reduces the risk that patients will experience erectile dysfunction.
_	A disclaimer may be added to mitigate the risk that a confidential email may be forwarded to a third-party recipient.
_	According to the Pan American Health Organization (PAHO) "concern that dead bodies are infectious can be considered a 'natural' reaction by persons wanting to protect themselves from disease" although "the risk that bodies [of those killed in a natural disaster] pose for the public is extremely small".
_	One major threat of violence is the risk that they may contract a sexually transmitted infection (STI) due to their labor and context-dependent barriers that can be either structural (government) or individual (fear) in nature.
_	Antibiotic use in livestock increases the risk that MRSA will develop among the livestock; strains MRSA ST 398 and CC398 are transmissible to humans.
_	Furthermore, from a defendant's point of view, it is more efficient and less dangerous to have each defense witness cross-examined in a single marathon deposition; otherwise, a witness may have to be deposed in hundreds of depositions around the country, which raises the risk that the witness may inadvertently give inconsistent testimony and destroy his or her credibility.
_	This enables the investor to evaluate the risk associated with the stock of interest and make an investment decision in accordance with the risk that they wish to assume and the profitability that they expect to obtain.
_	Low (as opposed to zero or negative) inflation may reduce the severity of economic recessions by enabling the labor market to adjust more quickly in a downturn, and reduce the risk that a liquidity trap prevents monetary policy from stabilizing the economy.
_	"BRCA2" mutation carriers have approximately double or triple the risk that they would normally have, including a higher than average risk of melanoma of the eye.
_	This carries the risk that unconsciousness may result before the need to breathe becomes overwhelming, which is why hyperventilation is particularly dangerous before free diving.
_	Patrick Gannon, president and CEO of OASIS from 2001 to 2008, minimized the risk that a company could take advantage of a standard to request royalties when it has been established:
_	These genes, in turn, increase the risk that more mutations will occur in developing lymphoid cells.
_	The creation of multiple populations will decrease the risk that catastrophic events will result in species extinction.
_	This enables them to trade more shares and contribute more liquidity with a set amount of capital, while limiting the risk that they will not be able to exit a position in the stock.
_	Due to the high costs, the enormous technical effort and the risk that a train of the U4 could be torn open laterally by a platform edge blocked in the extended position, this project was also filed.
_	By late 2007, she had become an integral part of his campaign, and was doing more trips and appearances on her own, despite the risk that added stress would aggravate her condition.
_	Plans to support the maintenance of open land by introducing red deer and wild boar, both of which occur naturally in the Eifel, as well as bison, elk and fallow deer, alongside red deer, were discarded because of the risk that the harsh winter climate would have driven these animals into the valleys, where they might pose a safety hazard to people as they would be too close to the villages.
_	Being so thin, it is very difficult, and actually not desirable, to manipulate individual pins: moving one pin at a time there is the risk that it bends, thus ruining the pinscreen.
_	In colder climates, in harsh weather and where winter food supplies may be scarce, they may roost in farm buildings and in barns between hay bales, but they then run the risk that their selected nesting hole may be taken over by some other, earlier-nesting species.
_	Using it in a non-secured reader is taking the risk that a keylogger intercepts the PIN, and point of sale malware gains access to the card details, or even intercepts a transaction to modify it or operates its own transaction.
_	Often it was claimed on behalf of their eldest sons, subtly reminding the court that the princely title was subordinate — at least in the law — to that of duke-peer, while minimising the risk that the princely style, used as a mere courtesy title, would be challenged or forbidden.
_	They support Admiral Rajampet's planned invasion of the Manticore System, despite the risk that failure would make them look even weaker.
_	They have also highlighted the risk that edibles pose to children, as they are often undistinguishable from ordinary foods once they are removed from their packaging.
_	In closed session, Sumner spoke out against the treaty; warning that there would be difficulty with the foreign nationals, noting the chronic rebellion that took place on the island, and the risk that the independence of Haiti, recognized by the United States in 1862, would be lost.
_	It has a tight bend and limited clearance, forcing the trolleybuses to flatten their trolley poles near their roofs, with the risk that the trolley poles will come off the wires.
_	(Note that if the currency of a savings account differs from the account holder's home currency, then there is the risk that the exchange rate between the two currencies will move unfavorably, so that the value in the account holder's home currency of the savings account decreases.)
_	Mónica Fein, mayor of Rosario, asked residents to avoid the area because of the risk that more buildings might collapse, and to ease the work of disaster management personnel.
_	Similar concerns were expressed in a 2006 review published by the World Organisation for Animal Health, which compared the American yellow rain accusations to other Cold War-era accusations from the Soviet Union and Cuba, as well as to more recent mistaken intelligence on Iraqi weapons capabilities, concluding that such unjustified accusations have encouraged the development of biological weapons and increased the risk that they might be used, as they have discredited arms-control efforts.
_	In practice, there is the risk that an inadvertent third party will find a number from an advertisement and submit it to an online or printed directory, causing it to receive additional calls for which the advertiser must pay individually as "leads" or enquiries.
_	They also mentioned that pederasty was not rare, "but was considered dangerous because of the risk that the boy will become pregnant".
_	Admission of a young person to a place may be restricted because of danger for that person, concern that the place may lead the person to immoral behavior or because of the risk that the young person causes damage (for example, at an exhibition of fragile items).
_	The United States-based Institute for Safe Medication Practices (ISMP) and the U.S. Food and Drug Administration (FDA) recommend that the symbol μg should not be used when communicating medical information due to the risk that the prefix μ (micro-) might be misread as the prefix m (milli-), resulting in a thousandfold overdose.
_	In turn, Mondale accepted the risk that came with her inexperience.
_	This offer by the Iranians matched a proposed solution put forth by an IAEA expert committee that was investigating the risk that civilian nuclear technologies could be used to make bombs.
_	"Kitty Hawk" was launched by flooding her drydock; the conventional slide down method was ruled out because of her mass and the risk that she might hit the Philadelphia shore on the far side of the Delaware River.
_	Safety stock is an additional quantity of an item held in the inventory to reduce the risk that the item will be out of stock.
_	If finished components are blueprinted, there is the risk that the further removal of material will weaken the component.
_	Interest rate futures are used to hedge against the risk that interest rates will move in an adverse direction, causing a cost to the company.
_	This approach, however, runs the risk that modules may be coded without having a clear idea of how they link to other parts of the system, and that such linking may not be as easy as first thought.
_	This avoids the risk that the cells could sediment/stick to the glass or some volume to evaporate before the cover-slip is placed on top and resulting in an overestimation of the cell concentration.
_	Aiming upward eliminates this risk but replaces it with the risk that the bullet may cause damage when it comes down to the ground again.
_	The review also recommended that individual banks' LIBOR submissions be published, but only after three months, to reduce the risk that they would be used as a measure of the submitting banks' creditworthiness.
_	Independent oversight minimises the risk that sources will be deterred from informing the press of matters of public interest, and ensures the media is not adversely affected by the measures.
_	Cole's argument is that the primary purpose test applied to acquiring foreign intelligence information when undertaking surveillance was "simply sought to reduce the risk that FISA, which permits searches on less than criminal probable cause, would become an end run around the constitutional requirement of criminal probable cause for searches conducted for criminal law purposes" and that although a secondary criminal purpose may later arise, the agency firstly must primarily gain the order to gain foreign intelligence information.
_	As well as this, the ring does not have an external battery but relies on the wearer's own life-energy, creating the risk that they would destroy themselves if they push themselves too far.
_	However, the fact that they are solid increases the risk that horse and rider will be injured if they make a mistake: the horse may hit it so hard that the rider is launched from the saddle or the horse may stumble over it and fall on landing.
_	Islam teaches that Allah alone should be worshipped; it also holds that banning pictures of Muhammad, the Prophets, and animate beings reduces the risk that they will be worshipped in his place.
_	The club's members enjoy having drinks in the clubhouse after a brisk eighteen holes, they do so fully aware of the risk that the Oldest Member who, though he has long since given up golf, has seen all and knows all, might pick up on their conversation and begin to relate a story from his experience.
_	Placing a cold trap at the mouth of such a pump greatly lowers the risk that oil vapours will backstream into the cavity.
_	The "D"-shaped cross-section, reinforcing ridges and backwards curve reduced the risk that the teeth would snap when "Tyrannosaurus" bit and pulled.
_	Master contracts also make it easier for newly organized workers, who get rolled into existing contract rather than having to negotiate their own first contract (with the risk that negotiations may drag on or collapse, causing the new union to eventually collapse).
_	The principal of these mortgages was guaranteed by Ginnie Mae, but not the risk that borrowers pay off the principal balance early or opt to refinance the loan, a set of possible future outcomes known as "prepayment risk."
_	In the past 20 years, although there has not been an increase in the total number of button cell batteries ingested in a year, researchers have noted a 6.7-fold increase in the risk that an ingestion would result in a moderate or major complication and 12.5-fold increase in fatalities comparing the last decade to the previous one.
_	The process of fractional-reserve banking expands the money supply of the economy but also increases the risk that a bank cannot meet its depositor withdrawals.
_	In statistics and decision theory, kurtosis risk is the risk that results when a statistical model assumes the normal distribution, but is applied to observations that have a tendency to occasionally be much farther (in terms of number of standard deviations) from the average than is expected for a normal distribution.
_	As a trade-off, AWS offers no SLA on these instances and customers take the risk that it can be interrupted with only two minutes of notification when Amazon needs the capacity back.
_	Musk and Altman's counter-intuitive strategy of trying to reduce the risk that AI will cause overall harm, by giving AI to everyone, is controversial among those who are concerned with existential risk from artificial intelligence.
_	For example, an established project team plans for the work to be done by its staff, but there is the risk that an employee may unexpectedly leave the team.
_	It protects public officials against the risk that their unwitting ambiguous statements may create legitimate expectations.
_	Then "the free will theodicist adds, however, that the value of free will (and the goods it makes possible) is so great as to outweigh the risk that it may be misused in various ways."
_	There were too many nearby enemy anti-air emplacements however, and the risk that they might lose any airlifted supplies was too great, so they had to wait.
_	In response to the risk that certain foods pose to those with food allergies, some countries have responded by instituting labeling laws that require food products to clearly inform consumers if their products contain major allergens or byproducts of major allergens among the ingredients intentionally added to foods.
_	Controls are generally imposed to limit the risk that this data may be abused or lead to loss of privacy.
_	When the rest of the power station was demolished, two of its seven cooling towers were left standing due to their close proximity to the M1 motorway, and the risk that their demolition might cause Tinsley Viaduct to be damaged.
_	This early warning system was a "first of its kind" designed to aid policy makers in determining the risk that a state faces for genocide.
_	In order to minimize the risk that some tapes might be lost or confiscated, each participant was only entrusted with a small part of the total work.
_	The Regulation starts on 30 November 2014 and requires that before import of these products or processing of raw logs, due diligence is undertaken to minimise the risk that the timber products or raw logs were illegally logged or incorporate illegally logged timber.
_	Furthermore, the new title—carrying with it the risk that the new emperor would "make drastic changes to the traditional styles and procedures of government" or "concentrate his attentions on Italy or on Mediterranean concerns more generally"—risked alienating the Frankish leadership.
_	In 1902, following the death of Caleb Adkins, the house and grounds were put up for sale, with the risk that it would be demolished for building houses on the estate.
_	The DOJ alleged that DirecTV had "unlawfully exchanged competitively-sensitive information" with AT&T (prior to its acquisition of DirecTV), Charter, and Cox Communications surrounding their negotiations and plans to carry SportsNet LA, in order to "obtain bargaining leverage and to reduce the risk that they would lose subscribers if they decided not to carry the channel but a competitor chose to do so."
_	Accordingly, to minimse the risk that these powers and law exemptions might be misused or abused, many countries have in place strong overview regimes to monitor the use and application of the LEA's powers and law exemptions.
_	In 1939, to avoid the risk that it would be destroyed in bombing attacks, the cupola was dismantled and stored at Clichy.
_	The cost of capital is the return expected from investors for bearing the risk that the projected cash flows of an investment deviate from expectations.
_	Perhaps the earliest-recognized and best-known danger of molecular nanotechnology is the risk that self-replicating nanorobots capable of functioning autonomously in the natural environment could quickly convert that natural environment (e.g., "biomass") into replicas of themselves (e.g., "nanomass") on a global basis, a scenario usually referred to as the "grey goo problem" but perhaps more properly termed "global ecophagy".
_	Safety was also an issue as there was the risk that passengers might get trapped in the gap created between the platform gates and the train as a result of the platform gates.
_	Risk of incorrect rejection: the risk that the sample supports the conclusion that the recorded amount balance is materially misstated when it is not materially misstated.
_	On the night of 5 February the transit began, the cavalry leading the way through the snow-covered ice, which quickly thawed beneath the horses’ hoofs so that the infantry which followed after had to wade through half an ell (nearly 2 feet) of sludge, facing the risk that the ice would break beneath their feet.
_	CR refers to the risk that a misstatement could occur but may not be detected and corrected or prevented by the entity's internal control mechanism.
_	The Third Basel Accord, the latest in a series of international agreements among central banks and financial regulators to standardize capital requirements for banks, directs financial institutions to, among other things, set aside additional capital reserves to account for the risk that counterparties participating in certain derivative agreements could default on the transaction.
_	Due to the moisture of the walls of the cathedral church, there was the risk that the piece could be destroyed.
_	However, the decisive opposition Antonio Fernández-Galiano, which eventually would be elected president to autonomous region of Madrid was part of the new community to address the risk that engulf the communities and surrounding provinces led to the current Castilla-La Mancha entity.
_	In particular the Court addressed the role of an exchange of notes between Italy (the state which sought to deport Saadi) and Tunisia (the receiving state, to which he would be deported) and ruled that it was inadequate to protect against the risk that Saadi would be ill-treated, as Tunisia had only restated Tunisian law and had not made the diplomatic assurances against ill-treatment requested by Italy.
_	Thus, because the art market's participants are far more limited in number than the securities or commodities markets, because artworks are not fungible, and because art valuation relies to a great extent on the advice and enthusiasm of a variety of specialized market analysts, these limitations each in turn dictate the size of the market and increase the risk that some items may be over or undervalued.
_	While any front armament can be used more easily on account of the gun not needing to synchronize itself with the propeller, the risk that spent casings fly into the props at the back somewhat offsets this risk.
_	Asset-backed risk is the risk that changes in one or more assets that support an asset-backed security will significantly impact the value of the supported security.
_	In addition to providing network connectivity for refugee and aid workers' smartphones and other devices, NetHope partnered with Cisco's Tactical Operations and Microsoft to deploy cybersecurity protection to mitigate the risk that organized crime or combatants related to the Syrian Civil War might attempt to compromise sensitive information on user devices.
_	To minimise the risk that another general might attempt to challenge him, Caesar passed a law that subjected governors to term limits.
_	He correctly assumed, however, that the ocean was too rough to allow Lacrosse to open his lower gunports without the risk that heavy waves would enter them and cause "Droits de l'Homme" to founder.
_	Political risk insurance is a type of insurance that can be taken out by businesses, of any size, against political risk—the risk that revolution or other political conditions will result in a loss.
_	When the results are taken out of their specific context there is the risk that they may be oversimplified or misused to make biased or partisan specific policy claims.
_	One of the biggest threats to beauty consumers is the risk that they are buying counterfeit products on familiar 3rd party retail platforms like Amazon.
_	Thanks to the infrastructure that has already been built in the area, the risk that the oil will reach the Gulf of Eilat has significantly dropped.
_	But constitutional law makes no attempt to link the constitutionality of a private delegation to the risk that it will place government power outside of constitutional controls.
_	Mortgage securitization enables mortgage originators to pass on the risk that the mortgages they originate might default and not hold the mortgages on their balance sheets and assume the risk.
